Over a period of 21 years (1972-1992), roughly 21,000 forensic autopsies revealed 39 cases (0.19%) of natural deaths occuring during sexual activity.
Except for two women, all of these cases were men of an average age of 61.3 years.
The most frequent cause of death was myocardial infarction (n=21/53.8%), three of these cases involving pericardial tamponade accompanied by myomalacia.
The medical history of twelve of the deceased showed a previous myocardial infarction.
Most of the deaths took place during or after sexual intercourse or manual stimulation.
In most cases sudden death occured during the sexual act with a prostitute.
The annual incidence of sudden cardiovascular deaths during sexual activity is estimated to be 0.2/100,000 men.
The risk for women is lower by a factor of 12.
Problem: An investigation into CT-controlled carve-suction biopsy for a histological clarification of indefinite intrathoracic masses.
Current concepts in treating arthritis by gene transfer are described, including different vector systems and strategies of gene transfer into target cells.
Promissing antiarthritic gene products are a variety of growth factors which facilitate increased matrix synthesis and mitogensis in articular chondrocytes.
Furthermore, rheumatoid joint destruction can be treated genetically by the transfer of certain antiinflammatory cytokine genes, which provide locally high concentrations of the antiinflammatory gene product.
First clinical trails using the IRAP gene (interleukin I receptor antagonist protein) to eliminate the inflammatory reaction caused by interleukin I in rheumatoid joints are on its way.
In order to investigate potential improvement in cartilage regeneration retroviral TGF- gene transfer in rabbit articular chondrocytes has been carried out.
The TGF- group showed an in vitro increase in collagen type II neosynthesis by 304 %, compared to normal chondrocytes.
Spreading depression is a fascinating phenomenon that can be provoked by chemical, electrical or mechanical stimuli of the cortex.
Spreading depression-like transient depolarizations are observed in the periinfarct tissue after focal ischemia.
The reduction in electrical activity and a negative direct current potential shift propagating over the cortex with a rate of 2-5 mm/minute are the physiological hallmarks.
It is thought that spreading depression and peri-infarct depolarizations might play a role in the pathogenesis of migraine and stroke.
However, these events have never been detected in humans.
This paper reviews the physiological characteristics of spreading depression and peri-infarct depolarizations and discusses their potential role in migraine and stroke.
Because of the shifting age peak, measles, mumps and rubella will be more and more a danger for adults.
The MMR combined vaccination reveals an effective method for prevention of these diseases and their consecutive symptoms.
By means of the twice-done MMR vaccination measles, mumps and the congenital rubella syndrome could be eliminated.
With the increasing demands on hospitals for improved quality and lower costs, hospitals have been forced to reevaluate their manner of operation and quality assurance programms.
Hospitals have also been faced with customer dissatisfaction and intense competition.
This article reviews current quality-management systems and examines their position in dermatology.
The continuous follow-up of all cruciate ligament lesions showed the correctness of patient-adapted procedures.
While the gold standard for repair is a replacement procedure, direct repair with autologous augmentation is an excellent option in adolescents.
The results of 13 single-stage reconstructions of large and complex defects in the head and neck by using eight free radial forearm flaps as well as five pectoralis major myocutaneous flaps were analyzed.
No complete flap loss occurred in any case.
The results with radial forearm flap reconstructions proved to be better functionally and aesthetically.
Due to the time needed for the microvascular anastomoses, the length of the operations was sometimes prolonged.
Pectoralis major flaps were found to be more difficult to handle and were used in those cases in which the application of free radial forearm flaps was expected to produce higher risks.
Psychotherapists have the alternative, to design quality assurance within certain boundaries by themselves, or otherwise leave this important task to external instances.
Those will apply their own criteria in developing a concept.
This paper discusses the question, how far quality assurance in the field of analytic psychotherapy has to accept the definitions and concepts from other fields such as industry or somatic medicine, without changing or deteriorating the quality that in the end should be improved.
Differentiation is necessary between the use of the Psy-BaDo for individual quality assurance of the individual psychotherapist and for quality- and psychotherapy-research.
This paper points out new approaches to modifying the present concept of quality assurance for the purposes of analytic psychotherapy.
Cicatrical pemphigoid (CP) comprises a groupf of patients with a chronic subepidermal blistering disease which primarily involves mucous membranes; lesions characteristically heal with scarring.
Immunofluorescence investigations typically demonstrate deposits of tissue bound and circulating immunoreactants of the IgG and less frequently of the IgA class in a linear pattern along the basement membrane zone.
These autoantibodies are thought to play an important role in the blister formation of CP.
Most patients show binding to the bullous pemphigoid antigen 2 (BPag2), collagen type XVII, with a molecularweight of 180 kD.
A smaller group of patients with CP have autoantibodies to laminin 5.
Animal models confirm that autoantibodies binding to these two adhesion molecules (BPag2 and laminin 5) are important in blister formation.
There are other autoantigens described in CP; however, they are only found in small groups of CP patients and most of them are not further characterised.
The described molecules are part of the hemidesmosomal adhesion complex.
Impaired function of any component of this complex may lead to a separation of the epidermis from the dermis; better knowledge about the single molecules and the exact localisation of epitopes within these molecules may lead to further understanding of the clinical picture.
Study objective: The clinical effect of ketoprofen is based not only on the inhibition of prostaglandin synthesis.
Ketoprofen also acts through kynurenic acid as a central antagonist on the NMDA receptor.
Due to this central analgesic mechanism of ketoprofen, we expected an analgesic preemptive effect.
This study was carried out following the Breivik/Stubhaug preemptive effect study design.
Dystopies of the bony orbit are caused mainly by craniosynostosis, facial clefts and encephaloceles.
This article presents the results of the surgical correction of orbital hypertelorism in 24 patients.
Using this operation technique, the bony interorbital distance was decreased from an average of 47.6 mm to 22.8 mm.
However, the distance between the soft tissues was not reduced by the same amount as the distance between the bony orbits.
The intercanthal distance decreased from an average of 58.5 mm to 44.5 mm, whereby an additional refixation of the medial palpebral ligament resulted in a reduction of the intercanthal distance to 40.8 mm.
A strabismus divergens was seen preoperatively in 18 patients, postoperatively only in 8 patients.
Four of the latter had to undergo operative correction of the diplopia.
We conclude that the operative technique is not reserved only for complex cases of hypertelorism because it shows satisfactory functional and aesthetic results with a low complication rate.
Four years after extensive pneumonectomy on the left side with resection of the aortic wall and patch reconstruction for a T4 carcinoma, 2 years after adjuvant radiation and 10 months after drainage therapy of late intrathoracic empyema, destruction of the infected Dacron patch led to rupture of the aorta descendens.
Successful primary emergency reconstruction of the aorta descendens was followed by venetian blind plasty (Heller) and transposition of the omentum majus for omentoplasty of the aortal wall and reduction of the pneumonectomy cavity.
The rate of prosthetic infections is between 0.3 and 2.5% and must be taken into consideration even in cases of intrathoracic vascular reconstruction with alloplastic prostheses.
After lung resection it is necessary to cover up the prosthetic graft by using autogenous material to obtain prosthetic incorporation into the protective tissue.
In intrathoracic infectious complications, extra-anatomic bypass grafting or autogenous vascular graft implantation should be considered.
If there is no possibility of carrying out these procedures, first aggressive local debridement of the infected vascular wall and afterwards coverage with alloplastic prosthetics with omentum transposition and thoracoplasty are essential to minimize postoperative infection and obtain solid anchorage in the surrounding tissue.
The evaluation of melanocytic tumors represents one of the most intriguing and challenging aspects of the daily practice in dermatohistopathology.
For the diagnosis of malignant melanoma and melanocytic nevi, standardized and reproducible criteria are required.
In case of the diagnosis of melanoma, the histopathological report must include all important data relevant for the prognosis which may also influence the therapeutic procedure.
The following paper summarizes the recommendations of the study group on malignant melanoma formed by the Deutsche Dermatologische Gesellschaft.
Recent studies have shown that acute infections, especially of the respiratory tract, are an important risk factor for cerebral ischemia.
Additionally we know that chronic dental infections may be a risk for myocardial infarction and artherosclerosis.
However, the connection between stroke and dental infections has hardly been examined so far.
Therefore we performed a case-control study using a standardized questionaire and examination.
We investigated 66 patients consecutive to a acute cerebral ischemia/stroke and 60 age- and sex-matched nonstroke neurological patients as a control group.
Dental status was determined by a so called total dental index (TDI) which reflects primarily caries, periodontitis, periapical lesions, devital and missing teeth as well as by a panoramic index (PI).
Specifically, older patients with cerebrovascular ischemia tended to have a significantly worse dental status and had more severe periodontitis and periapical lesions than control subjects.
A predefined poor dental status was associated with cerebrovascular ischemia independent from other vascular risk factors and social status.
In conclusion, poor dental health, mainly resulting from chronic dental infections, may be associated with an increased risk for cerebrovascular ischemia.
The results must now be verified in larger studies.
As chronic dental infections are a common and also easily treatable factor, their identification as a risk factor for stroke would be quite important in the field of preventive medicine.
Adjuvant basic therapy plays a central role  in the therapeutic approach to atopic eczema in childhood.
It involves the regular use of emollients and oil baths according to the clinical picture.
Emollients containing urea may cause problems when used in younger children due to their stinging effect.
Glucocorticosteroids still form the mainstay  of anti-inflammatory therapy and are superior to other topical drugs with anti-inflammatory effects.
Antihistamines preferably of the sedative type can be used successfully  during periods of exacerbation.
Systemic use of antibiotics is essential in cases of impetiginized atopic eczema.
In cases of bacterial-triggered eczema, the topical use of antibiotics in cases of limited or of antiseptics in generalized disease may be helpful.
The present paper presents data obtained over a 12 year period, on the matrix synthesis and turnover in some 650 arthritic and 180 non-arthritic (N) human cartilages using a standardised in vitro method.
When the relative metabolic (synthetic/repair activity) of these human cartilages was compared, it was demonstrated that in osteoarthritis (OA) and rheumatoid arthritis (RA) cartilages synthetic activity was diminished by approximately 50% as compared with N cartilages.
However, the turnover rate of matrix was not significantly different between Non-arthritic and OA, but was very substantially increased in RA cartilages compatible with the activity of inflammatory cells and proteolytic enzymes released from pannus.
The action of 13 NSAIDs was compared in terms of their effect on cartilage GAG synthesis.
3 of these NSAIDs were also studied in terms of their effect on cartilage collagen synthesis.
Consideration of the results in this study and from published material, led to the suggestion that NSAIDs may be divided into 3 categories in respect of their in vitro action on the extracellular matrix of human arthritic cartilages:   1.
Those such as Aceclofenac, Tenidap and Tolmetin which can stimulate matrix synthesis 2.
Those such as Piroxicam, Tiaprofenic Acid and Aspirin which appear to be without significant effect on matrix synthesis and, 3.
Those like Naproxen, Ibuprofen, Indomethacin, Nimezulide which significantly inhibit matrix synthesis.
It is suggested that the stimulatory action of group 1 NSAID is due to inhibition of locally produced IL1 and consequent expression of growth factor activity.
Other NSAIDs may also inhibit IL1 synthesis or release, but probably do not have a beneficial effect on chondrocyte synthetic activity as they have toxic effects on cartilage metabolism.
These experiments led to the suggestion that NSAIDs such as Aceclofenac would be appropriate for long-term treatment of arthritic conditions provided that one is prepared to extrapolate between in vitro experiments on human cartilage and what may be happening in vivo.
The article begins with a general introduction to the problems of pre-operative anxiety and its impact on the post-operative course development.
Then the treatment of a patient who developed an anxiety-syndrome before a necessary heart operation is described.
The treatment lasted 6 hours and included psychotherapy by guided affective imagery.
One and a half years later a follow-up interview was carried out by a colleague of the original therapist.
The interview was based on the assumption that patients are able to give a competent statement about their previous treatment.
The results are discussed under the aspect of therapeutic factors of psychotherapy.
Physiologically, angiogenesis in adults is a controlled process which plays a role, for example, in wound healing.
Pathological angiogenesis is observed in tumor formation and represents a multifactorial process, in which specific angiogenic factors, as well as growth factors, extracellular matrix proteins and cell adhesion molecules are involved.
Tumor growth is characterized by an imbalance in favor of angiogenic over angiogenesis-inhibiting factors.
Some of the most frequently examined angiogenic factors are vascular endothelial growth factor, acidic/basic fibroblast growth factors and the platelet-derived endothelial cell growth factor.
The most important angiogenesis inhibitors are angiostatin and thrombospondin.
To date, the clinical relevance of tumor angiogenesis has been shown for several human tumors.
For most urological tumors, the grade of tumor vessel formation, measured as microvessel density, has been associated with metastases, tumor growth and clinical course.
The prognostic value of this feature of malignant growth seems to be higher than that of most of the classical and newer prognostic factors.
Systematic investigations of tumor angiogenesis are becoming increasingly relevant for diagnostic and therapeutic strategies and offer opportunities for the development of new specific therapeutic approaches in clinical oncology.
Introduction: CPR is an essential part of resuscitation.
German medical students must take part in at least two low-level basic life support courses, one for a driver's license and one for admission to medical school.
The knowledge and skill of German medical students in CPR performance were studied.
Psychoanalysis is regarded to be mainly disorderoriented.
Indeed, since its beginning, it was characterised by the two-sided orientation towards disorder and resources.
Contemporary concepts of the psychoanalytic encounter, especially actualgenetic conceptions of the analysis of transference, lay the ground for better integrating both aspects.
This development implies new approaches to the psychoanalytic process and technique, and especially to interpretation.
More than before, contemporary psychoanalytic interpretation refers to progressive coping strategies within and outside transferential processes.
During the last few decades, traumatic injuries of the hip joint have significantly increased in number, and traffic accidents have also increased.
Depending on the speed, direction of the forces and the position of the femur at the moment of impact, different patterns of injury occur.
Basically, they are classified as hip dislocations, dislocation fractures and acetabular fractures.
These injuries have in common a high rate of concomitant lesions.
Several classification systems have been developed for these injuries.
Commonly, Stewart and Milford's or Levin's classification is used for dislocations and dislocation fractures.
For acetabular fractures, Judet and Letournel's classification and its newer version developed by Helfet (AO classification) are generally accepted.
Fractures of the femoral head, though included in these classifications, are typically described by separate classifications like the one presented in 1957 by Pipkin.
The multitude of injuries occuring in the hip joint requires vast knowledge of various operative approaches.
No single approach exists that would permit the treatment of all injuries in an ideal fashion.
Approaches are either considered limited (Kocher-Langenbeck, ilioinguinal iliofemoral) when they permit access only to a restricted segment of the joint, or extended (extended iliofemoral, Maryland, Ruedi) when they allow all-around visualization of the hip joint.
The choice of the best approach for an individual patient depends on the type of injury and also on patient variables like age, preexisting disease, and concomitant injuries.
The decision is further influenced by the timing of surgery, the kind of fracture stabilization intended and by complications typically seen with certain approaches.
The indication for extended procedures is only seen in patients with complex injury patterns involving both the anterior and the posterior column or in delayed cases undergoing surgery more than 3 weeks after trauma.
Extended approaches permit excellent visualization of the fracture, but the extent of the soft tissue trauma is reflected in a high rate of postoperative complications.
After a phase in which extended procedures were favored, recently a trend towards more limited approaches can be recognized because of their lower complication rate.
This is facilitated by modern fracture-reduction methods using indirect techniques.
A relation between myocardial ischemia and induction of ventricular arrhythmias can be demonstrated in patients with coronary heart disease - in contrast to patients with primary non ischemic cardiac diseases - using a combined metabolic-electrophysiological investigation protocol consisting of programmed atrial and ventricular stimulation with simultaneous measurement of the arterio/coronary venous difference for lactate, pyruvate, free fatty acids and amino acids.
There are significant metabolic distinctions between both ischemic and non ischemic heart disease under pacing stress conditions as well as at rest.
A 52 year old female with Parry-Romberg syndrome presented with gradual atrophy of the subcutaneous fat and muscle on her chest and back.
The disease process was limited to the C3 to T2 dermatomes on the right side.
In addition, there was muscle atrophy of the right arm and extending down the back to T10, als well as right sided paralysis of the diaphragm.
Sympathetic nerve blockage reduced pain and hyperesthesia; no progression was seen over several months using NMR to monitor the patient.
The Parry-Romberg syndrome has been defined in many ways; in view of this unusual case, we review the literature, attempting to provide a more accurate case definition.
Between 1990 and 1996, 129 children (mean age 4.8 years) with hip pain were examined consecutively.
In group I (n = 100, mean age 4.14  +/-  2.2), transient synovitis of the hip was diagnosed; group II (n = 29, mean age 7.3  +/-  2.1) showed the following diagnoses: Perthes' disease (n = 12), early slipped capital femoral epiphysis (n = 5), Meyer's dysplasia (n = 2), septic arthritis of the hip (n = 2), osteomyelitis of the acetabulum (n = 1), abscess of the psoas (n = 1), chondromatosis of the hip joint (n = 1), Ewing's sarcoma of the os pubis (n = 1), hip dysplasia (n = 1).
Three patients who had synovitis developed Perthes' disease and were assigned to group II.
The efficiency of ultrasound, scintigraphy and MRI as diagnostic tools was tested in the examination of painful hip.
A capsular distension was present in 73 cases and showed a significant statistical difference (t-test, P < 0.001) in group I between affected and unaffected hips.
There were no differences in the measurements of the epiphyseal and metaphyseal width in group I between the affected and the non-affected side (t-test, P = 0.91, P = 0.57) and between the first sonographic evaluation at presentation and at the follow-up (t-test, P = 0.053, P = 0.75).
MRI was performed, because of persistent joint effusion, in 10 cases in group I, and Perthes' disease was excluded.
In group II the use of an MRI allowed the diagnosis in 89 % of the cases.
Sonographic examination, together with X-ray examination and serological testing, represent the first choices in the evaluation of a painful hip at presentation and in the follow-up of transient synovitis.
MRI should always be performed when abnormalities are present at the clinical and sonographic examination, and when the X-ray does not allow a clear diagnosis.
A 36-year old woman was presented to our hospital with congenital ventricular septal defect and one-vessel coronary artery disease (75% proximal left main coronary artery) for CABG and repair of the VSD.
After induction, a transesophageal echocardiographic (TEE) baseline examination was performed, showing a severely dilated coronary sinus (CS) measuring approximately 3 cm (abnormal >1 cm).
We suggested a persistent left superior vena cava (PLSVC) draining into the CS.
PLSVC is a common venous congenital anomaly, with a reported incidence of 0.5% in general population and in 3-5 % of patients with congenital heart defect.
Injection of echo-contrast solution in a left arm vein, visualizing microbubbles passing through the PLSVC into the CS confirmed our suspicion.
The diagnosis of a PLSVC and dilated CS is a contraindication for retrograde cardioplegia because of the loss of cardioplegia into the PLSVC resulting in a inadequate myocardial protection.
It may be difficult to pass a pulmonary artery catheter (PAC) through a left internal or left subclavian vein and it may be associated with arrythmias.
A chest radiograph shows the anomalous course of the PAC along the left heart.
Teleradiologysystems can differ considerably in their features.
The most important differences lie in the mode of image data acquisition, data transfer, data safety aspects and the possibilities of interaction between seperate teleradiology units.
A selection of commercially available teleradiologysystems is presented and compared.
Craniopharyngiomas are the third frequent pediatric brain tumors.
Complications after surgical treatment are common.
The most frequent complications are endocrine disturbances, vision field defects, deteriorated acuity, cognitive or psychological deficiency as well as significant weight gain.
A case of complete vision loss right after surgical removal of craniopharyngioma is reported.
Magnetic resonance image showed an edema of the chiasm.
No damage of anatomical structure could be detected.
Seventeen days after surgery the patient reported intermittent  visual impressions for the first time.
Over the following weeks his visus improved to  0.5, while the chiasm edema disappeared.
Electron beam computed tomography (EBCT) allows viszalization and quantification of calcium in the coronary arteries.
This has been demonstrated to correlate well with the overall plaque burden in the coronary arteries.
EBCT is, therefore, well suited for the detection of early stages of coronary atherosclerosis.
Especially in asymptomatic patients with several risk factors, staging coronary artery disease by coronary calcium, scanning may allow prognostic assessment and guide preventive and therapeutic interventions.
We report an unusual complication in a 53-year-old woman following ileostomy for Crohn's disease 22 years previously.
A stenosis of the distal colonic segment was the reason for the formation and subsequent rupture of a huge colonic mucocele.
To our knowledge, this is the first report of a ruptured mucocele of colonic origin after ileostomy.
The brain is an important target organ for gonadal hormones.
Estrogens have protective and trophic effects on neural systems and modulate the activity of several neurotransmitter systems.
Initial studies support the hypothesis that estrogen therapy in menopause may have protective effects toward the development of dementia, particularly Alzheimer's disease.
Furthermore, estrogens may improve verbal fluency, memory, and mood in elderly women.
Still, the available evidence is not sufficient to support general treatment recommendations with respect to estrogens and the therapeutic targets dementia and depression.
A 38-year-old male patient presented with circumscribed scleroderma (10x12 cm) in the left pectoral area.
Hyperaemia of the skin in the area of the lilac ring (morphoea) was quantified by means of Laser-Doppler flux (LDF).
At the lilac border of the morphoea LDF was increased to 420% of the reference value recorded for the unaffected skin of the contralateral side.
Immediately after 13 days of antibiotic therapy (3x10 Mega penicillin G per day, i.v.)
LDF normalized, though clinical changes were hardly apparent at this stage.
By 6 months later, LDF was still in the normal range, and clinical signs, such as induration and hyperaemic redness, had also significantly improved.
LDF measurements allow assessment of the therapeutic response to antibiotic therapy at a very early stage while the clinical situation is still unchanged.
It is generally accepted that the progression of an idiopathic scoliotic deformity with a Cobb angle of between 25  ° and 40  ° can be stopped by brace treatment alone provided that the generally acknowledged criteria for the treatment concerning skeletal growth of the individual are respected.
The total costs for a department of anaesthesia amount to a fraction of the total hospital budget that is proportional to the overall number of hospital departments; this means anaesthetic departments are in general not cost drivers.
The medical treatment of erectile dysfunction includes the systemic (oral, epidermal, intramuscular) as well as the local (intracavernosal, intraurethral) application of pharma cological agents.
Up to now only yohimbine, a well-known alpha-receptor blocking agent, and sildenafil, a newly introduced phosphodiesterase V inhibitor with predominant peripheral action, have been approved and listed in Germany.
Other oral agents under investigation are trazodone and apomorphine (central action) as well as phentolamine (peripheral action).
For the small group of patients with an established testosterone deficit, the epidermal or intramuscular substitution of testosterone seems to be a reasonable alternative to other therapeutic options.
For the local application of pharmacological agents, intracavernosal injection therapy and intraurethral application ("medicated urethral system for erection", MUSE) are available.
Currently, several promising pharmacological agents with different modes of action and routes of administration are under investigation.
The ultimate goal of these basic and clinical research efforts is to develop a specific and "tailored" therapy for each individual patient.
While the pharmacological therapy of erectile dysfunction will most likely continue to be the therapeutic standard for most patients, it will certainly be augmented by devices (i. e. vacuum erection devices, "functional electromyostimulation of the corpus cavernosum", FEMCC) and surgical treatment options (vascular and prosthetic surgery).
We treated a large superficial basal cell carcinoma (ca.
10x6 cm) on the right breast in a 48-year old woman with photodynamic terapy (PDT).
Fractionated PDT was performed by topical application of -aminolevulinic acid (-ALA, 20%) with subsequent red light (570-750 nm; 180 J/cm2) in three sessions.
Nearly total remission of the tumor resulted; however, a few residual neoplastic islands partly infiltrating the nipple-areola complex could be detected by photodynamic diagnosis (PDD).
These fluorescent areas were marked, excised, and the defect was closed by a rotation advancement flap.
Total excision of the tumor was verified histologically.
By combining PDT and surgery, this large tumor was treated with excellent cosmetic results.
This case demonstrates the efficiency of topical PDT with adjunctive plastic surgery controlled by PDD even in large tumors.
In a prospective trial patients were interviewed in two periods, from 1988 to 1990 and from 1993 to 1995.
Ninety out of 189 patients (47,6%) with a histologically confirmed diagnosis of malignant melanoma who noted morphological changes in a pigmented lesion reported the mole had been present at least 10 years.
20,7% stated it was present since birth.
156 out of 189 patients (82,5%) noticed changes in the lesion over the time.
Growth, discolouration and elevation were the most frequent changes but no significant early sign of disease was found.
Bleeding and crusting were found with tumor thickness >1,5 mm and thus be signs of an advanced stage.
Almost 6 months passed until half of the patients visited a physician, either because of changes in the mole or in the lesion was detected during other medical examinations.
In the second period of the survey from 1993 to 1995 the physician was frequently consulted earlier.
The main reasons for the delay between identification by the patient and seeking medical cedure were lack of symptoms and the notion that the lesion was harmless.
Only 72 out of 189 patients (38,1%) visited the physician on their own initiative.
The primary evaluation of the "pigmental lesion" was done by a primary care physician in 57%, by a dermatologist in 32% and by others in 11% of our cases.
A diagnosis of a non-melanoma was made and no further steps were initiated by 27% of the primary care physicians and 22,7% of the surgeons, gynecologists or internists.
Only 5% of the dermatologists misdiagnosed the lesions.
In the second trial period from 1993 to 1995 in all physician groups the rate of misdiagnosis increased due to changes in heathcare services in the context of privatisation in our health care system in East Germany.
Whereas 83,2% of the patients first evaluated by dermatologists had a surgical removal of the mole within the first 2 months after consultation, the proportion for those diagnosed by non-dermatologists was only 58,5%.
The rate of primary treatment by surgeons, often with a small safety margin, also increased.
In 45 patients with Parkinson's disease, we investigated coping behavior and its correlations to demographic and disease-related data, locus of control, depression, and psychosocial adaptation.
Active, problem oriented, and self-reorganizing strategies were predominantly used and regarded as especially helpful by the 27 men and 18 women (age: 56 years; duration of illness: 9 years).
While age and sex were not associated with coping, external locus of control correlated positively to "depressive coping" and duration of illness correlated negatively to "distraction and self-affirmation."
Coping strategies regarded as maladaptive and a small degree of internal locus of control correlated to unfavourable results for depression and satisfaction.
The Internet has become a powerful, international source for information, and it has shown an exponential growth because of the ease of access and the immediate availability of information.
We introduced a new ophthalmological atlas including ICD coding on the World Wide Web.
So far, more than 500 lantern slides of typical and interesting ophthalmological findings have been selected and digitized.
These pictures were integrated in a data base, which was arranged for ease and speed of search and retrieval.
In its background, the data base contains a list of over 4700 ICD-encoded diagnoses to which the picture-documented findings are linked.
Comments on pictures can be added by the author or by users.
The data base contains several lists, such as a list of ICD codes and diagnoses, a list of all pictures with corresponding diagnoses, a list of all diagnoses and number of picture, a list of those diagnoses for which the corresponding picture is available, as well as a list of comments on each picture.
Special program scripts handle the user's search key words for diagnoses and extract the required information out of the data base, using Windows NT.
Search results are presented on an automatically built-up webpage.
To provide fast speed of search all pictures initially are shown in a small format (thumbnails) with little amount of data.
The related full-size picture is retrieved by a single mouse click.
Moreover, the name and institution of the author, diagnostical hints and comments on pictures by the author or by users are offered for each diagnosis available.
The Giessen Ophthalmological Picture Atlas can be reached in the Internet.
It allows a fast search free of charge from all over the world and, therefore, offers an additional option to obtain specific ophthalmological information for various purposes.
Even though the function of the myometrium is vital for the existence of all mammals, there is little knowledge about its ultrastructure.
So far, only the contractile filaments actin and myosin have been identified.
There is no evidence for the existence of other filament systems, either my means of electron microscopy or histochemically.
The indications, operative procedure, postoperative complications and advantages of laparoscopic ileostomy and colostomy as compared with "open" enterostomy are described and demonstrated in our own patients with Crohn's disease.
Major indications for laparoscopic enterostomy in patients with Crohn's disease are stenosis, fecal incontinence and complex anal fistulas in those with severe Crohn's proctitis.
Most Crohn patients tolerate laparoscopic enterostomy and an increasing number demand this minimally invasive technique.
The period of convalescence is much shorter and complications in connection with laparotomy are minimized.
We report on a complete longitudinal rupture of the urethra in combination with a rupture of the pubic symphysis and pelvic fracture during spontaneous vaginal delivery.
Only after stabilisation of the pelvic fracture by external skeletal fixation adaptation of the urethra was possible.
Three weeks later after removing of the transurethral catheter a mild stress incontinence could be observed.
In the follow up one year later the patient was completely continent.
The cosmetic result was satisfactory.
An unclear haematuria after delivery needs a meticulous urological examination.
Early repair of urethral disruption minimize the risk of severe incontinence.
Coordinated care between the trauma surgeon and urologist is required for successful treatment of this rare combined injury after birth.
The increased consumption of "ecstasy" (MDMA, 3,4-methylenedioxy-methamphetamine) has also increased the number of life-threatening intoxications.
From a Medline search of the years 1992-1996, reports were registered and evaluated.
Besides cerebral, cardiorespiratory, renal, and hepatic symptoms, hyperthermia syndromes such as malignant hyperthermia, neuroleptic malignant syndrome, or the serotonin syndrome were common.
In addition to a discussion of the intoxication symptoms and their acute and intensive-care therapy, the psychological and physiological effects of "ecstasy" will be described.
Some historical considerations of the topic are included in this review.
The goal of this prospective, randomised and double-blind pilot-study was to investigate the analgesic potency and the side-effects of tramadol enantiomers in clinical practice.
One hundred patients recovering from orthopaedic surgery with a postoperative pain intensity of more than 50 on a visual analogue scale 0-100 mm (Table 1) were recruited for the study.
They were treated in a randomised, double-blind way with a maximal dose of 150 mg i.v.
(+)-, (-)-tramadol, racemate, or 15 mg i.v.
morphine or saline in the placebo group (5 groups, 20 patients each).
The primary criterium of efficacy was the number of responders defined as patients with a pain reduction of at least 20 on VAS after 40 min.
In case of pain, responders were allowed to continue with the double-blind drug up to six hours.
The non-responders were treated with morphine as the rescue analgesic.
The secondary criterium was the incidence and severity of side-effects.
Six patients terminated the study prematurely.
One patient was excluded because of an allergic reaction to morphine, one patient could not be treated sufficiently with morphine, four were excluded because of protocol violations.
There were 8 responders in the (+)-tramadol-, 6 in the (-)-tramadol- and 6 in the racemate group, 16* (P<0,05) in the morphine group, and 5 in the placebo group.
Pain intensity after 40 min was reduced by 20 (p<0,05), 17 (p<0,05), 17 (p<0,05), 36 (p<0,01 vs placebo, p<0,05 vs (+)-, (-)-tramadol, and racemate group) and 5 mm on the VAS in the (+)-, (-)-, (+/-)-tramadol-, morphine- and placebo-group, respectively.
Thirty eight adverse events like nausea, vomiting, PCO2-increase, and urinary retention occurred in 20 patients, most frequently in the (+)-tramadol- and morphine group.
Sedation was significantly less profound in the (-)-tramadol group 1-4 h postoperatively.
There were no side-effect in the tramadol racemate group.
The enantiomers were equal to the racemate in analgesic potency, but inferior by far to morphine.
They showed more adverse events and, hence, can not be preferred to the racemate in postoperative pain therapy.
A 36-year-old man known as chronic alcohol abuser presently suffered from arthralgia and showed bilateral petriefied kidneys by sonography and computed tomography.
Because of an unclear renal failure a kidney biopsy was performed and presented typical chronic renal oxalosis with massive oxalate crystal deposits, tubular atrophy and interstitital fibrosis.
Since the man had never shown signs of hyperoxaluria in his life before, a secondary oxalosis was supposed.
The subsequently prompted exploration established a three to four times abuse of rocket fuel with cola lemonade 12 years before during the patient's army time as a marine soldier.
Such fuels contain ethylene glycol (glysantin) as antifreeze commonly known to cause in toxic doses acute renal tubular necrosis with hyperoxaluria.
The presented case, however, suggests a rare sublethal ethylene glycol poisoning with initial renal tubular damage, oxalate crystal deposition and subsequent chronic interstitial oxalate nephritis with tubular atrophy, interstitial fibrosis and chronic renal failure.
Undergoing chronic hemodialysis, the patient died 5 months after the kidney biopsy diagnosis by acute heart failure.
At autopsy, progressed chronic renal oxalosis could be confirmed.
Decompensated oxalate cardiomyopathy with disseminated myocardial oxalate crystal deposits caused acute heart failure promoted by myocardial hypertrophy in renal hypertension.
Insulinomas are rare tumors and account for 90 % of all endocrine pancreatic tumors.
They typically present as a solitary tumor, but may occur in multiple sites (e.g.
multiple endocrine neoplasia type I) or as a malignant disease in 10 % of cases and rarely as nesidioblastosis or islet cell adenomatosis.
Neuroglucopenic symptoms lead to the diagnosis; inadequate high insulin and C-peptide secretion with hypoglycemia in the fasting test confirm the diagnosis.
Preoperative localization is not necessary prior to the first operation.
The standard operation is enucleation or, depending on size and location, resection.
The treatment of multiple tumors and islet cell hyperplasia with a high risk of recurrence is problematic.
Subtotal resection plus enucleation seems to be better than selective tumor resection.
In malignant insulinomas, mostly presenting with liver metastases, aggressive surgical therapy with hepatectomy and debulking, chemoembolization and systemic chemotherapy are the modalities of choice.
MR spectroscopy is the only method for non-invasive detection of various aspects of cardiac metabolism in humans.
While the 1H nucleus of water and fat molecules is the signal source for MR imaging, the MR spectroscopic technique allows for the study of a number of other nuclei, such as 13C, 19F, 23Na, 31P, 39K and 87Rb.
Clinical applications presently are confined to the 31P nucleus.
31P-MR spectroscopy allows the non-invasive study of cardiac high-energy phosphate metabolites ATP and phosphocreatine.
The phosphocreatine/ATP ratio is considered an index of the energetic state of the heart.
Possible clinical indications include heart failure, valve disease and coronary artery disease.
In heart failure, the phosphocreatine/ATP ratio is reduced and correlates with clinical severity, ejection fraction and prognosis.
In mitral and aortic valve disease, a reduced phosphocreatine/ATP ratio may indicate the optimum timing for valve replacement.
In coronary artery disease, a regional decrease of phosphocreatine during stress ("biochemical ergometry") may indicate local ischemia.
Furthermore, absolute quantification of high-energy phosphates may allow diagnosis of myocardial viability.
Major technical developments, leading to improved spatial and temporal resolution will be necessary to establish MR spectroscopy as a routine clinical tool.
A retrospective and partly prospective study was conducted to analyse both clinically and cephalometrically the craniofacial growth pattern of patients with isolated and syndrome-related premature craniosynostosis after standardized fronto-orbital and midface advancement.
The file data of 293 children with fronto-orbital advancement were evaluated over an average period of 4.4 years.
In addition, lateral teleradiographies of 117 patients from this group were cephalometrically analysed.
Moreover, late results of 36 children and  8 adults with midface-advancement with an average follow-up period of 4.5 years were assessed.
In contrast to linear craniectomy and so-called lateral canthal advancement, in only 8.2% of cases (24 out of 293 patients) were relapses requiring reoperation found in this study after fronto-orbital advancement.
The evaluations indicate that with simple forms of craniosynostosis such as trigonocephaly and plagiocephaly predominantly very good or good growth can be observed.
Cephalometric evaluation confirmed the limited potential of growth in the area of the anterior skull base and in the midface in the presence of syndrome-related faciocraniosynostoses.
In such cases the cephalometrically confirmed maxillary hypoplasia, which increases in severity in the following order of syndromes `Saethre-Chotzen-Crouzon-Apert-Pfeiffer', could be influenced only to a limited degree by fronto-orbital advancement.
For this reason midface advancement is of secondary importance in children with very severe anomalies.
In the present evaluation, a high rate of relapse of midfacial hypoplasia was to be found in children and adolescents after this operation in accordance with other references.
Therefore, the indication for Le Fort III osteotomy in the growth period should be limited.
The introduction of Perfluorochemicals into medicine and especially into the treatment of severe lung injury is a fascinating scientific task.
Many recall the famous experiments from Clark et al.
in 1966 when he demonstrated "liquidventilation with perfluorocarbons" in the mammal species for the first time.
After this hallmark, perfluorocarbons were subsequently introduced in research of acute lung injury by the techniques of Total- and Partial-Liquid-Ventilation (TLV; PLV).
Perfluorocarbons (saturated organofluorids) have unique chemical and physical properties which made them attractive substances for intraalveolar application.
The strong C-F bindings in the perfluorocarbon molecules are responsible for their chemical stability, biochemical inertness, high capacity to dissolve respiratory gases, low surface tension and high vapor pressures.
Furthermore, the high density of the PFC lead to radio-opacity and their distribution to dependent lung areas.
The efficacy of PFC liquid, applied by TLV/PLV has been demonstrated in numerous animal studies using different models of acute lung injury.
Currently, several mechanisms of action of perfluorocarbon fluids in acute lung injury are discussed: recruitment of atelectatic alveoli, prevention of endexpiratory collapse of alveoli ("liquid PEEP"), redistribution of perfusion, oxygen transport, surfactant like effects and decrease of inflammation.
Since total liquid ventilation has been used only in experimental models of lung injury, partial liquid ventilation has been introduced successfully into clinical trials (phase I-II).
However, the results of the first randomised, controlled study of PLV in 90 adult patients suffering from severe respiratory failure (ALI/ARDS) showed no differences between PLV and conventional treatment.
Furthermore, the instillation of relatively large amounts of liquid into the lungs poses several technical challenges and may be associated with complications such as liquithoraces, pneumothoraces and hypoxia.
Since mammal lungs are evolutionary specialised to gas exchange using atmospheric oxygen, the application of liquids, even if they transport respiratory gases very well is not physiologic.
To overcome these unwanted side effects, we developed a technique of perfluorocarbon vaporisation in analogy to the application of inhalation anaesthetic agents.
After resolving some technical issues, this application technique was used successfully in an animal model of acute lung injury.
Vaporisation of perfluorohexane in a concentration of 18 Vol.% of inspired gas improved significantly oxygenation and lung compliance.
Though these results are promising, mechanisms of action, dose-efficacy relation, surfactant-perfluorocarbon interaction or anti-inflammatory effects of vaporised perfluorohexane are still unclear.
These questions need to be clarified before this technique can be applied clinically.
However, the inhalation of vapor, a technique already familiar to anaesthesiologists should avoid risks of large amounts of fluids in the bronchoalveolar space.
Furthermore, this technique can be administered by established anaesthetic equipment with the advantage of exact dosing, continuous monitoring, and demand application in a way near to clinical routine.
VDD pacing using a single pass lead for complete heart block is well described in adults but there are few reports of its use in children.
We have used 6 different standard adult size single pass leads and 5 different pacemaker generators in 21 children and adolescents aged 3.7-17.2 years (mean 9.9 years) and weighing 13.5 to 76 kg (mean 34.3 kg).
Congenital complete heart block was present in 14 patients (with associated heart disease in 2 of them), surgical complete heart block in 6 patients and 2:1 AV block of uncertain cause in 1 patient.
In 10 patients, the VDD system was their first pacing system.
In 11 of the patients, 1-6 previous systems had been used and simultaneous extraction of ventricular leads (10) and/or atrial leads (5) was performed.
All leads were introduced via a subclavian vein puncture (using the extraction sheath when present) and the atrial dipole was placed low in the right atrium to provide slack for further growth while maintaining atrial sensing.
Ventricular thresholds ranged from 0.2 to 0.8 V. The minimal atrial amplitude was 0.7 to 4 mV and the maximum amplitude was 2.5 to 8 mV.
There was one early micro-displacement and the lead was repositioned.
Over a follow-up period of 2-64 months (mean 32 months), all but 1 of the patients have maintained low ventricular pacing thresholds and adequate atrial signals for reliable pacing at rest and with exercise.
During this time some have undergone considerable growth.
In 1 patient, atrial sensing was lost after cardiopulmonary bypass for additional cardiac surgery at 24 months and the pacemaker was programmed into VVIR mode.
One patient with coexisting congenital heart disease died suddenly at 3 years but the pacing system had no fault at autopsy.
The standard adult size single pass lead provides a simple means to enable reliable atrial synchronous ventricular pacing in growing children with complete heart block.
Open reduction with internal stabilization is considered to be the standard therapy for the treatment of displaced acetabular fractures.
The internal fixation is routinely achieved by the use of plates and screws.
The use of cerclage wires and cables as a reduction aid and definitive implant for stabilization has only occasionally been reported in the literature.
The indication was mostly limited to use in elderly patients with insufficient bone stock.
A newly instrument developed on the basis of a standard bone elevator is presented.
It allows a safe, semiclosed application of a cerclage wire around the greater ischiatic notch through use of the second window of the ilioinguinal approach.
A wide dissection at the "outside" of the pelvis is not necessary.
A 35 year old patient developed swellings in the red colored areas of his tattoo.
Histological examination revealed a lichenoid, pseudolymphomatous infiltrative pattern, that could be distinguished from frank lymphoma by means of electron microscopy, immunohistochemistry and molecular biology.
The presence of dermal dendritic cells suggests a dermal-allergic pathogenesis of non-granulomatous tattoo reactions.
Therapy of choice is an excision of the inflamed areas.
Interventional duct occlusion is increasingly performed with detachable coils.
In a series of 33 patients (34 procedures), we consistently used Gianturco-coils which were the initially employed coils.
They are not securable but can be implanted in a simple manner.
The rate of embolization was high (28 %) in the first 14 procedures; however, it declined to 5 % in the last 20 patients.
We modified the technique by partially blocking the duct, when necessary, with a catheter which was advanced from the pulmonary artery and by implanting up to three coils.
There was only one embolization and one small residual shunt in the last 20 patients.
The mean fluoroscopy time in these patients was 11.0  +/-  5.8 minutes and decreased to 7.0  +/-  3.2 minutes in the last 10 patients with successful closure.
Considering our experience, we continue to recommend the use of Gianturco-coils especially in the small duct which can be closed quickliy at low cost.
This review presents data supporting the involvement of the dopaminergic system in depressive illness.
Neuroanatomical research, animal research and clinical studies have shown that a dysfunction of the mesolimbic dopaminergic system could be associated with depressive symptoms.
Furthermore, the chronic administration of antidepressants in animals provokes a sensitisation and enhanced expression of dopaminergic receptors.
Although the dopaminergic system has received little attention in biological research on depression in the last decades, current research on the dopaminergic system is about to change this situation.
Athletes who need high endurance capacity often use training at moderately high altitude (1500-3000 m) to improve oxygen delivery and utilization because of a hypoxia-induced increase of the red blood cell volume and adaptations at the muscular level.
As maximal heart rates decrease at high altitude and plasma lactate levels for a given workload change during prolonged exposure to high altitude, it can be difficult to control and adapt the intensity and duration of the work-outs.
Furthermore, maximal performance capacity decreases and therefore training intensity at high altitude is usually reduced compared to training at sea level.
To avoid these disadvantages at high altitude a concept of living at moderately high altitude and training at lower elevations, termed "live high - train low" evolved, opposing the conventional concept of "live high - train high".
A third option using a hypobaric chamber ("live low - train low") is hardly used anymore for training athletes.
Studies on the effects of conventional high-altitude training for the improvement of athletic performance often lack a rigorous controlled design and yield controversial results.
Regarding the new concept of "live high - train low" there is only one controlled study on college athletes and it shows a minor advantage of this new approach compared to conventional high-altitude training.
However, training concepts are especially important for elite competitive athletes, and controlled studies with such individuals are very difficult to perform.
Therefore, it appears that today we cannot answer the question of whether altitude-specific physiologic factors or non-altitude-related benefits of training camps account for the success of individual athletes.
Purpose: To answer the following questions: whether reliable detection of lesions is possible in low-field-MRI-system (Magnetom Open 0.2 T) equipped with currently available hard- and software components in comparison to high field system (Magnetom Impact 1.0 T).
Furthermore, whether localization of lesions suspect in MR-mammography can be realized in MR system of low field (Magnetom Open 0.2 T).
Patients and Methods: In 11 patients, suspect lesions were diagnosed in diagnostic MR-mammography acquired with high field system (Magnetom Impact 1.0 T) and were compared to low field MR-mammographies of 0.2 T (Magnetom Open 0.2 T).
In six of the 11 patients a suspect lesion was localized using wire marking.
Results: All lesions considered suspect in diagnostic MR-mammography (Magnetom Impact 1.0 T) were also clearly identified in the 0.2 T system (Magnetom Open).
In six cases wire marking was performed without any complications and with an accuracy of K 0.5 cm distance to the lesion.
Conclusion: Although studies in the 0.2 T system clearly showed inferior SNR (34.6 vs. 83.1) and CNR (14.6 vs. 43.5) compared to studies with the high field system, all lesions considered suspect in diagnostic MR-mammography were reliably identified also in 0.2 T studies.
Due to its open construction permitting permanent access to the breast and due to sufficient image quality, the Magnetom Open is suitable for interventions on the breast.
Children with limb deficiencies or amputations of the lower extremities should be enabled to stand or to walk according to their state of development, because just standing and walking are among the most important preconditions for the best possible integration.
Supply them with a prosthesis, orthesis and orthoprosthesis is therefore indispensable for rehabilitation.
While a prosthesis replaces parts of the extremities, orthesis stabilizes the existing extremity.
Orthoprostheses compensate longitudinal malformations, have a supporting effect, allow growth to be controlled and compensate for shortening.
Just as important as the remedy is early medical treatment.
The sooner the treatment starts, the better the results.
As a result of the present experiences with the inhalative application of nitric oxide (NO) in term babies now the first promising reports about NO application in preterm babies have been published.
HIV remains infectious at room temperature for about six to twelve hours under sterile conditions, the time is shorter in the presence of bacteria and when clotting occurs.
HIV infectivity is easily destroyed by disinfectants.
The human infectious dose of HIV is around 100 to 1000 particles, dependent on the virus and the site of entry into the host.
After inoculation new HIV is produced after 24 hours, and HIV has spread over the whole organism by the end of one or two weeks.
HIV infection may be detected after four to twelve weeks by antibody assays, and after eleven days by nucleic acid based assays.
Anti-HIV production might be slowed down under initial therapy.
In addition to psychiatric outpatient treatment, the detoxification of alcoholics in psychiatric hospitals is an important link between medical detoxification and psychosocial inpatient treatment aiming at abstinence.
Integrated models of inpatient detoxification and motivation therapy focus on improvement of the motivation of patients towards further treatment of their alcoholism and towards abstinence.
In our study 529 alcoholics underwent such treatment lasting between 2 to 3 weeks.
A total of 469 patients (89%) were followed up after 8  months; 242 alcoholics (52% of the follow-up sample; 46% of the whole sample) achieved the treatment goal and started further treatment, mainly as inpatients.
Fifty-four of these patients relapsed before they started further alcoholism treatment, but achieved abstinence afterwards; 60 (25%) of these 242 patients relapsed after the specific alcoholism therapy; 227 alcoholics did not start further treatment after the initial detoxification and motivation therapy.
In this subpopulation, 113 (50%) relapsed during the follow-up period.
Although this is not a controlled study, it can be concluded that integrated inpatient detoxification and motivation therapy has positive effects on the treatment behavior of alcoholic patients and enhances the probability of further abstinence.
In this article we report a very rare case of simultaneous and bilateral rupture of the quadriceps tendon in a 38-year-old patient.
The initial diagnosis was "herniated vertebral disk".
Although there was an extensive neurological and psychiatric examination in combination with several operations, it took almost 3 months until the real reason was found.
In this case report we describe our postoperative treatment of early mobilization and compare it with other therapies.
Neuroendocrine tumors of the thymus, also known as thymic carcinoids, are rare tumors of the anterior mediastinum.
They occur sporadically or in association with the MEN I syndrome.
We present five patients (four male, one female; age of first manifestation 19-53 years) who were operated on at our hospital between 1984 and 1995 for neuroendocrine thymic tumors.
A hormone-producing tumor presented with Cushing's syndrome in two patients.
Two patients had MEN I syndrome.
Only in the female patient the primary tumor was confined to the thymus.
We found lymph node metastases in three patients and a distant metastasis in one.
The neuroendocrine tumors have a high rate of local recurrences and thus we performed 11 operations using a transthoracic or transsternal approach.
Since there was no operative mortality and adjuvant therapies are of limited value, we recommend surgery even in case of recurrence.
Korsakoff's psychosis (Wernicke-Korsakoff-Syndrome) following severe, long-term  alcoholism is considered to be widely resistent to treatment.
We report two cases with beneficial effects of treatment by a combination of clonidine and fluvoxamine.
The dopamine hypothesis of schizophrenia was based on the neuroleptical blockade of central dopamine D2 receptors.
Brain imaging studies, however, generally failed to demonstrate a significant increase in central D2 receptors among schizophrenic patients.
Using a novel approach, the group of Laruelle and Abi-Dargham was now able to demonstrate that schizophrenic patients have increased synaptic dopamine concentrations in the striatum.
Endogenous dopamine competes with a radioligand for binding at dopamine D2 receptors; compared to healthy control subjects, blockade of dopamine production in neuroleptic-naive schizophrenic patients induced a significantly higher increase in D2 binding of the infused radioligand, indicating higher endogenous synaptic dopamine.
A similar increase in D2 binding was also observed in drug-free schizophrenics who had previously been treated with neuroleptics; these patients also showed an increased density of striatal D2 receptors, most likely due to counteradaptive upregulation of D2 receptors during neuroleptic medication.
The Columbia study provides an important indication of hyperdopaminergic function in schizophrenia.
Multiple and bilateral oncocytomas are rare.
There are only ten cases that have been previously described.
Three of these displayed multiple and bilateral oncocytomas and microoncocytomas, a so-called oncocytomatosis.
This report describes a case of renal oncocytomatosis found at autopsy.
In addition, we found an adrenal adenoma, a pheochromocytoma and thoracic cicatrices 4 years after curatively resected large cell carcinoma of the lung.
In the distal renal tubules we found oncocytic epithelial cells, with partial transition into microoncocytomas.
Immunhistochemically, these and the main oncocytomas were CD 10 negative.
These findings support the origin of oncocytoma from oncocytically transformed distal tubular epithelium.
CGH analysis of the different tumors revealed no common cytogenetic changes.
Coexistence of renal oncocytoma with other tumors is rare.
Hitherto, coexistence of a renal oncocytomatosis with multiple tumors has not been described.
Thyroid disorders in childhood needing surgery are rare.
Therapeutical procedures therefore are derived from adult surgery with modifications to meet the specific need of the pediatric patient.
The indications for operation are presented with regard to incidence and type of the defect, and the surgical procedures with regard to the extent of the lesion results.
Malignant bone tumors require the same careful staging as, for example, lung cancer.
However, well-established staging systems for non-osseous tumors are not suitable for bone tumors.
Therefore we present Enneking's staging system for malign bone tumors here, which is better adapted to the special problems of these entities because it integrates clinical, radiological and histological findings.
The weak points of Enneking's staging system (e.g.
inflexibility, changes in radiological modalities in the past 20 years) are discussed.
Efficient analgesia may be the major objective in the cardiovascular risk patient following myocardial infarction, acute occlusion of peripheral vessels, or dissection/perforation of major abdominal vessels.
It was the purpose of the study to investigate the haemodynamic and respiratory side effects of eight different opioids in 57 circulatory risk patients prior to major vascular surgery.
Patients were randomly allocated to eight groups, each receiving a different opioid within a clinical, equipotent dose range (buprenorphine, fentanyl, morphine, nalbuphine, pentazocine, pethidine, tramadol, alfentanil).
A complete haemodynamic and blood gas status was obtained prior to as well as 5, 10, 15, and 20 min following opioid administration.
Monitoring included a complete invasive haemodynamic and blood gas status.
Statistical evaluation was performed by 1- and 2-factorial ANOVA (P<0.05).
Significant time effects (changes from baseline at the time of measurement) were observed for heart rate and total peripheral resistance, while significant group (group-specific differences in the course of values at the different times of measurements) and time effects were noted for mean pulmonary artery pressure, pulmonary capillary wedge pressure, stroke volume index, and PaO2.
No major effects were observed following morphine, fentanyl, alfentanil, tramadol, and nalbuphine.
Buprenorphine caused distinct respiratory depression accompanied by an increase in pulmonary vascular tone.
Pentazocine and pethidine caused a significant increase in MPAP and peripheral vascular resistance while pethidine also produced marked respiratory depression.
For interpretation of the results, factors such as respiratory depression, histamine release, secretion of endogenous catecholamines, and hypoxia-induced pulmonary vasoconstriction have to be discussed.
Tramadol, an opioid with moderate potency, seems to offer some advantages due to its minor cardiovascular and respiratory side effects.
In this article we report a case of an early postoperative compartment syndrome of the anterior tibial compartment with complete sensomotoric palsy of the peroneal nerve after arthroscopic-assisted replacement of the anterior cruciate ligament (ACL) of the knee.
The tourniquet pressure was 360 mm Hg and operation time was 1.75 h. After the operation the leg was bandaged to avoid swelling of the leg and as antithrombotic prophylaxis.
Analgesic therapy was by continuous epidural bupivacaine infusion.
Increasing pain of the lower leg was suppressed by additional analgesia.
Due to persistent pain despite regular analgesia, the patient was sent to a main hospital on the 3rd postoperative day, where an extremely painful and swollen anterior tibial compartment with intracompartimental pressure of over 100 mm Hg was found.
The compartment was released immediately.
Despite the appearance of severe muscle damage, no extensive débridement was done.
At the second examination, at 48 h, there was minimal perfusion of the muscles without contraction and islands of ischemic necrosis.
Clinically, there was complete palsy of the dorsiflexors of the foot.
The case shows the danger of a compartment syndrome when tourniquet of the limb, arthroscopy and a firm bandage are combined.
Continuous epidural analgesia masks the classic symptoms of compartment syndrome.
The influence of biomechanics in surgery of the locomotor apparatus has been constantly increasing over the last few decades.
The purpose of this study was to determine wether biomechanical studies can significantly influence therapy and treatment of shoulder injuries, especially shoulder instability.
The investigation was performed on 23 fresh human specimens with intact capsular ligaments of the glenohumeral joint.
A Bankart lesion from 3 o'clock to 6 o'clock was repaired, and a Bankart repair and anterior inferior capsular shift, as described by Neer, were performed.
The measurement was done on six clinically relevant positions of instability: superior, anterior, anterior-inferior, inferior, posterior-inferior, posterior.
Measurement was done using a specially developed strain-gauge system.
It was demonstrated that both instability and too much stability of the shoulder joint lead to a significant change in shoulder biomechanics.
The anatomical 0-position of the glenohumeral joint in 110  ° of abduction is a position of about 60  ° of external rotation compared to the 0-position for clinical measurement.
From the therapy point of view, one has to ask for anatomical reconstruction instead of tight repair in soft-tissue repair in the glenohumeral joint.
Immediate post-operative rehabilitation in a 60  ° range of motion is possible.
A total of 61 patients suffering from weight loss and epigastric pain were screened by color flow Duplex imaging (CFDJ) of the abdominal vessels.
Criteria for diagnosis were (1) peak flow in the celiac axis (CA) of more than 200 cm/s; (2) fixing of the CA stenosis during expiration and inspiration, and (3) steal phenomenon and reversal of flow in the superior mesenteric artery (SMA).
Results: Of 61 patients 21 (34.4%) fulfilled the criteria; 38 (62.3%) were excluded, and 2 patients could not be evaluated.
Of 21 patients 10 were operated on after confirming diagnosis by angiography of CA and SMA.
After a follow-up of 28 months 80% of the operated patients were free of symptoms, 10% improved, and 10% showed no change.
Conclusion: Successful operative treatment of CA compression includes (1) CFDJ of CA and SMA proving stenosis persisting in inspirational position of the diaphragm; (2) angiography of CA and SMA showing a steal phenomenon including blood flow reversal in SMA; (3) triad of symptoms: epigastric pain, postprandial pain and weight loss; and (4) exclusion of other causes, i.e.
pancreatic cancer, pancreatitis etc.
Extremely radical and radical surgical treatment of breast cancer was investigated with regard to indication, prognosis and local recurrence in comparison to current standard breast-conserving procedures.
Plastic-reconstructive techniques and innovative therapeutical approaches such as preoperative chemotherapy can extend the indications for breast-conserving therapy without loss of oncological safety.
Choosing individually various oncoplastic techniques such as glandular adaptation, local or distant flaps or mammoplasty permits breast remodeling with excellent cosmetic results.
We present the variety of intraglandular techniques and local flaps that enable the breast surgeon to achieve good symmetry and breast shape with minimal surgery and scarring.
Lesions detected in the white matter by T2-weighted MRI are often inadvertently attributed to multiple sclerosis (MS).
Patients with rheumatic diseases are commonly treated as an outpatient in their local environment or are referred to specialized centers.
Two recently founded daypatient clinics in Berlin and Frankfurt/Rhein-Main (Germany) for patients suffering from rheumatic diseases will be evaluated for their medical outcome and cost-effectivness of comprehensive treatment of RA patients in stages of high inflammatory activity and progressive disability.
The study design will be prospective, controlled, and randomized to compare outpatient and daypatient treatment.
The case-control study design with matched pairs within the network of collaborative arthritis centers will be used to compare daypatient and inpatient treatment.
The paper contains a review of studies published in English or German language dealing with daypatient treatment of RA patients.
A case of atrial ectopic tachycardia in an infant probably caused by a small tumor in the interatrial septum is presented.
The arrhythmia was successfully treated with amiodarone.
Several histologic abnormalities are known to cause AET, but an intracardiac tumor detectable by two-dimensional echocardiography is extremely rare.
AET - especially in childhood - as well as cardiac tumors show a tendency to regression, so that even in this case medical treatment should be the first therapeutic choice.
Interventional or surgical treatment is required just for those patients with AET that is resistant to medical treatment or reoccurs after finishing the medical treatment.
Tonsure trichotillomania is a subtype of trichotillomania in which the scalp exhibits a tonsural pattern of alopecia over the crown, extending to the frontal margin and sparing the lateral margins and the nape of the neck.
It differs from to the more common form of childhood trichotillomania in that predominantly female adolescents are affected and its incidence is related to quite severely pathologic psychodynamics, often with a disturbed relationship to female sexuality.
The treating physician should be more guarded in assessing the prognosis; hair plucking often continues for years.
Two patients with tonsure alopecia, associated in one case with trichotillomania of the pubic hair and in the other with enuresis, are presented.
The aim of the following study was to develop an osteoporotic model by means of ovariectomy.
Bone mineral density of the upper and lower jaw was measured by dual energy X-ray absorptiometry (DPX) before and after ovariectomy.
Histomorphometric measurements were done by a microtomography system.
Bone mineral density decreased significantly after ovariectomy in the upper and lower jaw.
There is evidence for the community effectiveness of preventive geriatric intervention programs prior to the need for help or long-term care from a couple of prospective randomized controlled trials (RCTs).
For geriatric rehabilitation programs tailored to older people with imminent or manifest need for long-term care analogous - evidence is still lacking.
The nation-wide leading boards of the FRG's Sickness Insurance Administration in conjunction with its Central Medical Service have formulated guidelines for the formation of a nation-wide ambulatory geriatric rehabilitation service to realize the postulate of the long-term care insurance legislation "rehabilitation prior to long-term care".
These guidelines must be proven empirically.
To prove the effectiveness and efficiency of the foreseen ambulatory geriatric rehabilitation service, the RCT design would be highly desirable.
Unfortunately, the prerequisites in the field of methodology are poor since valid, reproducible and feasible criteria for the selection of suitable patients and measurement criteria which meet the requirement of proven medium-term sensitivity to change do not yet exist.
Nevertheless, there is a great and urgent need, for the first time, to investigate the cost-effectiveness ratio for this ambulatory geriatric rehabilitation service to be established in the FRG, leaving aside the methodologic desiderata of randomized control-groups.
"Idiopathic" ventricular tachycardia is an exclusion diagnosis.
The underlying reasons and mechanisms of "idiopathic" ventricular tachycardias are still not completely understood.
Recent investigations showed a high prevalence of morphological abnormalities in the right ventricle of patients with "idiopathic" ventricular tachycardia out of the right ventricular outflow tract, which could often be correlated with the origin of the ventricular tachycardia.
These described abnormalities were not uniform.
Here we report about a patient suffering from drug-refractory "idiopathic" ventricular tachycardia for 10 years.
This is the first report in which the origin of an "idiopathic" ventricular tachycardia could be localized by right-ventricular angiography, magnetic resonance tomography and electrophysiological study in the area of an interventricular septal thickening of the right ventricular outflow tract and cured by radiofrequency catheter ablation.
Fetal teratomas are extra- or intracorporal congenital malformations with different localization.
Although they are rare, they may provoke severe obstetrical complications if they are not prenatally diagnosed.
If sonographic examination of fetal teratomas is performed, it is necessary to evaluate the further development of pregnancy for fetal outcome and pregnancy aspects in relationship to the localization, size and ultrasound criteria of the tumor.
Sonographic findings reveal the criteria and conditions for conservative or invasive management or reasons for continuing or terminating the pregnancy.
Prenatal ultrasound examination is the only possibility to reduce perinatal morbidity and mortality, as exemplified by 8 prenatally examined fetal teratomas.
We report on a 62-year-old female patient with melena in which polypoid lesions of the cecum were discovered endoscopically.
Histological examination of mucosal biopsies revealed an inflammatory process with lots of histiocytes and so-called Michaelis-Gutmann bodies, leading to the diagnosis of a malakoplakia of the colon.
No other organs were found affected.
In the course of an antibiotic therapy, there was no melena detectable over a period of six months.
Malakoplakia, an inflammation usually affecting the urogenital tract, is rarely found in the colon, with only 35 cases published until now.
It is frequently associated with other diseases like neoplastic or inflammatory disorders, immune defect syndromes or heroin abuse.
This spectrum is expanded by our report in which a long-standing alcohol abuse was found as an attendant disease.
Unilateral laterothoracic exanthem a (ULE) is a self-limited, probably infectious-allergic skin disease predominately affecting small children.
We describe five such cases.
The typical unilaterally located or at least unilaterally dominant exanthem usually starts in the axillary region and is characterized by red, partly confluent papules and fine scales.
Two of the children presented with atypical manifestations of ULE.
Due to its asymptomatic course, therapy is not necessary in the majority of cases.
Minimally invasive adrenalectomy is now an accepted alternative to conventional adrenalectomy.
As in open surgery, several different endoscopic approaches to the adrenal glands have been described.
In principle, one must distinguish between the laparoscopic and the retroperitoneoscopic access.
All adrenal tumors - pheochromocytomas included - except adrenal carcinomas can be removed endoscopically.
However, the use of these techniques is limited in patients with particularly large tumors.
The results reported to date are convincing.
Only limited data are available as yet to compare conventional and endoscopic adrenalectomy.
Because adrenal diseases requiring surgery are rare, endoscopic adrenalectomy is an operation that, for the present, will be limited to centers with a particular interest in laparoscopic and endocrine surgery.
Economic evaluations have become more and more important in the somatotherapeutic field.
This survey's objective was to examine if the current economic evaluation techniques can be applied to psychotherapy.
8 data banks, 17 key words from the psychotherapeutic field and 14 economic key words were used, the identified original studies were classified in accordance with Drummond, the methodical quality of each study was assessed at a score between 0 and 10 points.
21 studies were found: 16 cost- benefit analyses, 4 cost-effectiveness analyses and one cost-utility analysis.
The quality of the representation of the clinical results (mean value 8.6) was better than that of the economic results (mean value 6.1).
It was perfectly possible to evaluate psychotherapeutic interventions with regard to economic aspects by means of the current techniques but in most cases there was a considerable lack of quality in both representation and calculation.
Furthermore the evaluation type of cost-utility analysis, which is the only one that takes quality of life aspects into consideration and therewith seems to be the most appropriate approach regarding the psychotherapeutic field, has been greatly ignored.
As a net effect of ACE-inhibitors and AT1-receptor antagonists on the renin-angiotensin system (RAS) cardioprotection due to vasodilative (reduction of blood pressure, afterload reduction), antiproliferative (reduced cell growth, reduction of "vascular" andor "ventricular remodeling", reduced formation of extracellular matrix), as well as antiadrenergic actions and due to the stimulating effect on natriuresis, reduction of blood pressure, preload reduction can be expected.
These aims of therapy have mostly been confirmed for the action of ACE-inhibitors by experimental and clinical studies but except for the treatment of arterial hypertension and few preliminary reports concerning the treatment of cardiac dysfunction, no comparable data are available for AT1-receptor antagonists.
To date, an antithrombotic and profibrinolytic action could only be demonstrated for ACE-inhibitors.
This effect has been discussed to be responsible for the improvement of long-term prognosis in patients with coronary artery disease.
Despite the similar spectrum of action there exist important differences between ACE-inhibitors and AT1-receptor antagonists that might underline the need of an individual use of these drugs: the dual action of ACE-inhibitors on the RAS and the kinin system bears many benefits but has been also shown to be accompanied by side-effects, mainly chronic dry cough, in a relatively high percentage of patients thus leading to discontinuation of therapy in 8-14%.
This respective side-effect can be prevented by the use of AT1-receptor antagonists.
It has been discussed whether the incomplete action of ACE-inhibitors on AT1-receptor-mediated effects is at least in part responsible for the efficacy of this drug which is relatively high (75-80%) as compared to other substances.
Due to their direct action, AT1-receptor-blockers might also be of high effectiveness for the treatment of severe heart failure.
A combination of the ACE-inhibitor-mediated activation of the kinin-system with the more specific blockade of AT1-receptors by AT1-receptor antagonists might be of benefit and is currently under investigation.
Finally, it has been discussed that the incresed AT II concentration in case of AT1-receptor-blockade activates AT2-receptor-mediated mechanisms thus leading to an additive vasoprotective effect.
An isomorphic response is defined as a nonspecific skin stimulus eliciting a disease-specific skin reaction.
We report on the development of the Koebner phenomenon in a 32 year old patient with psoriasis after skin testing with UVB at a dose above 0,055 J/cm2.
In addition we describe a 28 years old patient who developed new psoriatic plaques in the areas affected by the virus after a varicella infection.
The presence of nicotine in sweat obtained from smokers and one non-smoker exposed to tobacco smoke after 4 h to 8 days of nicotine-free time was investigated.
Following stimulation of the eccrine glands, sweat samples were taken every hour for 6 h.The total nicotine concentrations, i.e.
the sum of nicotine and its metabolites, were determined by radioimmunoassay.
The presence of unchanged nicotine was revealed by gas chromatography/mass spectrometry.
Up to now there is no specific treatment targeting the ultimate cause of interstitial cystitis (IC), since its pathogenesis and etiology are still unknown.
Most studies focussing on oral medication have not been randomized, double-blinded or placebo-controlled.
Numerous case reports and intent-to-treat trials are lacking a systematic approach and do not meet evidence-based medicine criteria.
Consequently there is as yet no standard oral therapy available for the treatment of IC.
Differential radiomodification induced by 2-deoxy-D-glucose (2-DG) is proving to be a feasible modality for optimizing tumor radiotherapy.
Our earlier work on Ehrlich ascites tumor cells has shown that pretreatment with hematoporphyrin derivatives increases the uptake and phosphorylation of 2-DG.
Moreover, the alteration induced in bioenergetic profile was more drastic and less reversible.
The promising combination of hematoporphyrin derivatives and 2-DG has been further evaluated in the Ehrlich ascites tumor bearing mice for determining the effects on radiotherapeutic response.
Solid tumors (average volume = 0.9 +/- 0.1 cm3) implanted in Swiss-albino strain "A" mice were focally irradiated (10 Gy) using 60Co teletherapy.
Tumor bioenergetics was assessed by 31P MR spectroscopy.
The uptake and phosphorylation of 2-DG was observed to be increased following pretreatment with hematoporphyrin derivatives.
Upon hematoporphyrin derivatives + 2-DG treatment followed by irridiation, the intracellular pH reduced and a remarkable increase in glycerophosphorylcholine and inorganic phosphate levels was observed.
The present study demonstrates the potential of hematoporphyrin derivative pretreatment in increasing the bioavailability of 2-DG in a mice Ehrlich ascites tumor model.
The finding may have interesting clinical implications in the form of increased manifestation of the radiation-induced damage in the case of use of these drugs as a potential adjuvant in radiotherapy of tumors.
The novel Lenz (1835) by the German author, social revolutionist and physician Georg Büchner (1813-1837) can be regarded as a prominent document in the history of medicine.
On the one hand, Büchner's description of a schizophrenic disorder meets recent criteria; on the other, he hints at the physician's modern general attitude toward the patient.
The latter is derived from his philosophy of art and political motives.
The hypothesis is discussed that a dysfunction of the descending antinociceptive system may underly the pain of fibromyalgia.
Data from animal experimentation show that an interruption of the system by spinal cord cooling leads to (1) increase in ongoing activity,  (2) lowering in stimulation threshold, and (3) increase in response magnitude in nociceptive dorsal horn neurons.
The influence of the descending system was stronger on the responses to input from deep nociceptors than to input from cutaneous nociceptors.
If similar changes occur also in patients, an impairment of the tonicly active descending system should be followed by (1) spontaneous pain (ongoing activity), (2) tenderness (lowering in mechanical threshold), and (3) hyperalgesia (increased responses to noxious stimuli).
These changes should affect mainly deep pain, because the antinociceptive system influences predominantly input from deep nociceptors.
Animal experiments with microbiologic examinations and studies in cell cultures have shown that ionomer cement is a biocompatible and biostable bone replacement material in the head and neck region.
Clinical and functional results of its use in the human middle ear have proven to be satisfactory during a maximal period of 2.5 years observation.
The present trial was continued in order to determine the long-term behavior of ionomer cement (Ionos partial and total ossicles) after reconstruction of the ossicular chain.
The ossicular chain was reconstructed in 343 cases and included various losses of one or more of the ossicles (i.e., incus, incus and malleus, incus and stapes superstructure, and malleus, incus and stapes superstructure).
Follow-up extended over a maximum period of 5.5 years.
Patients were examined under a surgical microscope and a pure-tone audiogram was performed at regular intervals.
Preimplantation genetic diagnosis (PGD) is not presently performed in Germany.
According to PGD's opponents there, existing laws for the protection of embryos forbid this type of diagnostics.
Proponents feel that these laws do not stand in the way of PGD, depending on legal viewpoint.
This controversy has hindered PGD's application in Germany.
The nature of this longstanding, emotional discussion is not easy to describe to scientists abroad.
This retrospective study investigated the stability of the small AO external fixator in a radioradial configuration used in the treatment of 42 mostly unstable distal radius fractures (types A-3.2, C-1.2 and C-2.1 according to the AO classification).
No bone grafting was performed.
All cases were documented with antero-posterior and lateral X-rays preoperatively, 0, 2 and 6 weeks postoperatively and after consolidation.
Early functional aftertreatment was started one week after surgery.
Thirty-six fractures showed a dorsal comminution, combined with osteopenia in 18 cases.
The mean preoperative radial angle of 17 ° was normalized to 25 ° postoperatively.
The mean preoperative volar angle of minus 30 ° was reduced to 12 ° postoperatively.
None of these mean angles changed until consolidation.
The external fixator was removed on average after 7 weeks (range 6-10 weeks) depending on the radiological fracture healing.
The small AO external fixator in a radioradial configuration proved to be stable enough for early functional aftertreatment of the wrist.
Its stability is related to a proper operative technique and correct indication (unstable Colles type with one or two distal fragments).
Bone grafting is unnecessary if the external fixator is left in situ until bony consolidation.
Purpose: To develop and implement a method to obtain digital subtraction (DS) spiral computed tomography angiograms (SCTA) in order to avoid superimposition of bony structures and vascular calcifications on SCTA maximum intensity projections (MIPs) and shaded surface display (SSD).
The concept of small-volume resuscitation, the rapid infusion of a small volume (4 ml/kg BW) of hyperosmolar 7.2-7.5% saline solution for the initial therapy of severe hypovolemia and shock was advocated more than a decade ago.
Numerous publications have established that hyperosmolar saline solution can restore arterial blood pressure, cardiac index and oxygen delivery as well as organ perfusion to pre-shock values.
Most prehospital studies failed to yield conclusive results with respect to a reduction in overall mortality.
A meta-analysis of preclinical studies from North and South America, however, has indicated an increase in survival rate by 5.1% following small-volume resuscitation when compared to standard of care.
Moreover, small-volume resuscitation appears to be of specific impact in patients suffering from head injuries with increased ICP and in severest trauma requiring immediate surgical intervention.
The utility of electron beam computed tomography (EBT) to estimate cerebral blood volume (CBV) and cerebral blood flow (CBF) was evaluated.
Eleven patients with suspected acute cerebral ischemia were investigated.
The EBT was performed with an acquisition time of 50 ms per slice at eight parallel levels.
To compare signal/noise and contrast/ noise ratios the data from the EBT investigation were compared to a similar examination on a spiral CT.
The signal/noise ratio with EBT was about 30%, the contrast/noise ratio 25% of that with spiral CT.
The absolute values of CBV were 4.9 +/- 1.2 ml/100 g (EBT); CBF was 50.5 +/- 7.0 ml/100 g/min in normal contralateral brain tissue.
In four patients with proven infarcts on follow-up, the ischemic areas had a CBV ranging from 1.7 to 3.8 ml/100 g, while CBF ranged from 9.4 to 24.5 ml/100 g/min.
Using a bolus injection of contrast material, calculation of absolute CBV and CBF is feasible using EBT.
Advantages of EBT are the absolute measurements possible and it's multislice capability.
Disadvantages, however, are caused by the high image noise, limiting the demarcation of ischemic tissue.
The report, in two parts, sums up the findings of a survey covering 52 cities in Central Europe.
Most administrations have imposed a ban on feeding street pigeons, but this has been more or less unsuccessful.
Information campaigns were used on a large scale, along with more controversial methods such as catching the birds or shooting them down, providing pigeon houses, administering hormone preparations, chemosterilization, and exclusion from buildings.
Few attempts were made to reduce the number of breeding places.
Population reduction by poisons or natural enemies seems to be negligible.
We report a rare case of an accident during which a pedestrian was hit by a car and was thrown through the windscreen into the front seat.
Apart from the high speed (100 km/h or more) the traumatic amputation of both lower legs and the resulting reduced angular momentum mainly contributed to the final position of the pedestrian in the vehicle.
In addition, the low height of the person standing in front of the vehicle is deemed to have been a supporting factor for the course of the accident.
A 41-year-old woman with severe juvenile diabetes mellitus suffered from profund hypothermia after loss of thermoregulation in diabetic ketoacidosis.
She was found unconscious, without measurable blood pressure; the electrocardiogram (ECG) showed bradycardia of 30/min and the rectal temperature was 23.7  °C.
The patient received mechanical ventilation, fluid therapy, warmed gastric lavage, and, unfortunately, inotropic medication.
She was transferred to a department of cardiac surgery in order to continue the therapy with cardiopulmonary bypass (CPB).
On arrival, the patient had a rectal temperature of 27.3  °C, the ECG showed an absolute arrhythmia with a frequency of 70/min, and the blood pressure was 63/43 mm Hg.
We decided to use a rapidly available but not highly invasive venovenous hemofiltration technique for slowly rewarming the patient.
Vascular access was achieved by percutaneous femoral vein cannulation with a Shaldon catheter.
The hemofiltration system (Gambro AK-10, Gambro AB, Sweden) was instituted with a blood flow rate of 200 ml/min.
The hemofiltration monitor controls the pumps for filtering and substituting fluid volumes and allows the infusion solutions to be heated up to 40  °C.
Sinus rhythm resumed without antiarrhythmic medications at a temperature of 29.5  °C, and within 8 h the patient was rewarmed to 35.5  °C.
After treatment of the adult respiratory distress syndrome caused by pneumonia, she was discharged from the intensive care unit to complete treatment with no evidence of any permanent organ damage.
We conclude that hemofiltration may be the method of choice for rewarming deeply hypothermic patients when their circulation is preserved.
Under these circumstances, it is preferable to external rewarming techniques, as it avoids the disadvantages of temperature afterdrop and rewarming shock.
Rewarming rates of 1.5  °C/h seem to be adequate.
Hemofiltration systems are more widespread, less invasive, and easier to handle compared to CPB techniques, which should be preferred in situations of prolonged unsuccessful cardiopulmonary resuscitation with cardiac arrest and deep core temperatures.
We report an unusual injury of the face caused by the spoke of an automatic telescoping umbrella that come loose when the umbrella was opened.
Due to the shot-like force of the spoke, the left nostril, septum and right wall of the nasal cavity were pierced.
The part with the joint penetrated into the maxillary antrum.
In order to remove the spoke, wire scissors had to be used to cuff off the spoke's joint inside the surgically opened maxillary sinus.
Seven patients with pulmonary metastases of malignant melanoma were treated with inhalation therapy with 36 million IU interleukin-2 for six months.
Inhalation therapy was combined with four bolus infusions of DTIC at a dose of 850 mg/m2 once every four weeks.
Response rates were 71,4% with 2 patients achieving a complete remission (CR), 2 partial remissions (PR), 1 stable disease (SD), and 2 progressing disease (PD).
Therapy was well tolerated with low toxicity.
Six of the patients developed cough; one patient was slightly feverish.
We conclude that inhalation therapy of lung metastases is a promising addition to the therapeutic arsenal against malignant melanoma.
Twelve patients with extensive lichen planus, resistant to different regimes of prior external and internal therapy, were treated with PUVA-bath photochemotherapy (psoralen bath followed by UVA irradiation) using bath water containing 0,5 mg/L of 8-methoxypsoralen (8-MOP).
In 11 of the 12 patients, the skin lesions showed a significant improvement or even complete remission within six weeks of treatment.
In one patient, only limited clinical improvement could be achieved.
A mean of 19,1 (SD +/- 3,6) PUVA-bath treatments were carried out.
The mean cumulative UVA-dose given until clearance of the lichen planus was 16,7 (SD +/- 4,8) J/cm2.
No side effects were seen except an increased phototoxic reaction in two patients manifested as slight erythema.
The results of this trial show, that PUVA-bath photochemotherapy with 8-MOP is an effective therapeutic alternative to all other known therapies in the treatment of extensive, exanthematic and also hypertrophic-hyperkeratotic lichen planus.
In comparison to oral PUVA therapy and PUVA-bath therapy using 4,5',8-trimethoxypsoralen, balneophotochemotherapy with 8-MOP shows an excellent efficiency-side effect correlation.
The clearance of the refractive skin lesions by balneophotochemotherapy with 8-MOP demonstrates the superiority of this therapy over all other common therapeutic modalities used for lichen planus.
Critical illness polyneuropathy (CIP) may occur in up to 70% of septic patients and multiple organ failure patients.
Typical clinical signs of CIP are the difficulty to wean the patient from artificial respiration, a symmetrical flaccid quadriparesis/-plegia that is more pronounced in the distal parts of the limbs, reduced or absent deep tendon reflexes, and muscular atrophy.
This article describes and discusses the clinical and electrophysiological features and clinical outcomes, physiopathological concepts, therapeutic implications, and the complex differential diagnosis of CIP from a neurological point of view, focusing on disorders of the nervous system and myopathic abnormalities.
The data available in the literature were reviewed and compared to our own findings in order to deduce a clinical definition of CIP.
It is a particular aim of this work to emphasize the crucial importance of electrophysiological investigation and monitoring in the classification of the nature and extent of neuromuscular disturbances in critically ill patients.
Myths about development during midlife are examined in the light of recent research studies.
These studies show clearly, that midlife is a developmental phase of its own, the course of which can only slightly be predicted by previous development.
The assumption of a depressive crisis automatically occuring must be rejected as well as "positive myths" denying the evolving limitations in certain areas of life.
Developmental tasks and developmental possibilities are described as well as the clinical concept of a phase-specific "return of the repressed".
Possibilities of councelling and psychotherapy with couples during midlife are outlined.
The general aspects for the analysis of malalignment of the low tibial region in the three-dimensional space are discussed.
Recommendations for clinical and radiological diagnostics prior to low tibial osteotomies are given.
Closing wedge, opening wedge, dome-shaped, distraction, rotational and step-shaped osteotomies as well as combined procedures are described.
The possibilities of these techniques are pointed out for malalignment after lower leg, pilon and ankle fractures, as well as after trauma of the distal epiphysis of the tibia.
Arthroscopy of the ankle is an additional tool for detailed planning of the adequate surgical procedure.
The importance of determining an early correction cannot be underestimated.
The original reason for using the German "Habilitation" degree to mean that a candidade had qualified and could conduct research and teach at a university is no longer really valid, as this is being threatened by its importance to further careers.
Medical faculties must discuss how this development can be curtailed.
In order to check the current situation, the Habilitation degree systems of 36 medical faculties of German universities were compared with the aid of a scoring system.
Conformity existed only in the demand for a doctoral dissertation, scientific publications and a lecture on approval.
Concerning other criteria for qualification there was decreasing consensus in the following order: Habilitation thesis, commitment to teaching, further professional education, participation in congresses, inaugural lecture, qualification to teach, scientific activity, broad background in the discipline, and introduction to the faculty.
Application of the scoring system with a maximum of 33 score points resulted in a mean value of 15.2 points and a range from 6 to 29 points.
A significant decrease in the score values occurred with increasing age of the Habilitation degree (P = 0.002).
Even if scoring systems are ambiguous and unfair, our analysis revealed serious differences in the quality of the Habilitation degree.
Presuming that the German Habilitation degree should be maintained as a high-level qualification, we developed proposals that might be used to standardize this academic examination.
Chronic reduction in uteroplacental blood flow causes intrauterine growth retardation (IUGR).
In an animal model fetal umbilical perfusion in experimentally induced IUGR was examined.
Pregnant sheep were instrumented with externally adjustable occluders on the common internal iliac artery to regulate uterine blood flow in the last third of gestation.
Flow probes on the uterine arteries and the common umbilical artery provided blood flow measurements.
Uterine blood flow was restricted in the group destined to become growth retarded whereas uterine blood flow in the equally instrumented controls was allowed to rise normally.
When the experiment was terminated and morphometric data were obtained, uterine blood flow in controls was significantly higher than in restricted animals.
Body weight and ponderal index in fetuses of flow-restricted mothers was significantly lower than in controls.
Umbilical blood flow in IUGR animals was lower than in controls.
The relation between uterine and umbilical blood flow became closer with advancing gestational age.
Chronic reduction of uterine blood flow in late pregnant sheep causes IUGR accompanied by changes in umbilical blood flow which may be due to fetal adaptation.
Four hundred and eighty-eight radical retropubic prostatectomies (RRP) were performed on clinically localized prostate cancer at one institution within 5 years (1992-1996).
These were then analyzed regarding the migration of pathological tumor stages towards more localized stages.
Within the observation period, the annual rate of RRP increased by 81 % from 69 to 125 cases.
The authors noted a decline in the occurrence of advanced tumor stages (65.0 % to 39.2 %) and small cancers ( < 0.5 cc: 7.2 % to 1.6 %) and an increase in pathological T2 tumors (30.4 % to 55.2 %).
The rate of positive surgical margins declined from 34.7 % to 12.8 % (for all pathological stages).
These data confirm trends which were observed in the USA with increasing detection and treatment of localized prostate cancer.
Prognostic assessment of acute global cerebral anoxia following cardiorespiratory arrest requiresa high level of clinical and technical diagnostic skills.
Statements regarding prognosis of this form of coma can be made only with reference toa large number of clinical, neurophysiological, biochemical, and cerebral imaging data.
Previous research in this field has usually been restricted to only one or a few parameters such as clinical data, EEG findings, evoked potentials or biochemical markers.
The present compilation of the various aspects regarding diagnosis and prognosis is intended to define the present state of the art in diagnosis and prognosis of anoxic coma, and also serve as a basis for a multicenter prospective study including all of the relevant data to improve diagnosis and arrive at guidelines for effective prognostication of anoxic coma.
In 96 patients (ductal pancreatic carcinoma, n = 34; periampullary carcinoma, n = 43; chronic pancreatitis, n = 19) the role of CA 19-9 in the diagnosis of lesions of the head of the pancreas were evaluated.
The sensitivity for ductal pancreatic carcinoma was 73.3 %, for periampullary carcinoma 48.8 %, and specificity was 63.2 %.
Carcinoembryonic antigen was elevated only in every fifth patient.
Even when combining the two tumor markers no increase in sensitivity could be observed.
The low specificity of 63 %, which decreased to 33 % in the case of obstructive jaundice, does not allow adequate preoperative differentiation between cancer patients and those with chronic pancreatitis.
In cases of postoperatively elevated CA 19-9 level the prognosis is worse than in patients with normal tumor markers.
The management of neuromuscular foot deformities in children and adolescents must be individualized because of differences in etiology and pathomechanics.
If conservative treatment fails or reaches a plateau early soft tissue procedures are recommended.
Treatment should focus not only at correction of the deformity but also at reestablishment of muscular balance.
Early postoperative mobilisation is usually possible provided adequate orthotic control is maintained.
Regular clinical follow-ups help to minimize postoperative problems.
The general aim should be an optimization of functions and only rarely to achieve a normal foot.
The basic principles of management can be described as correction of deformity, stabilization of unstable joints and balance of muscle power.
This study was carried out from 1986 to 1996 to evaluate the technique of translaminal epidural endoscopic discectomy in lumbar hernias occupying over 50% of the radicular canal, foraminal hernias, and hernias invading it entirely.
This minimally invasive arthroscopic technique was applied in patients suffering from degenerative lumbar stenosis between L3 and S1.
The first part of the study dealt with lumbar hernias.
Of a total of 222 patients, 175 (78.82%) showed radicular canal invasion ranging between 50 and 90%.
The disc level was L4-L5 in 59%, L5-S1 in 39%, and L3-L4 in 4%.
Most of these hernias were lateral extrusions.
However, the study also included protrusions and foraminal hernias, since they were large and technically difficult to operate on.
In terms of distribution,  25 patients (14.28%) had protrusions and 120 (68.57%) extrusions, and in 30 patients (17.14%) hernias had migrated.
Surgery was carried out by the biportal posterior approach through the flaval ligament.
An irrigation pump was used and the structures were under permanent accurate arthroscopic visualization.
Good results were obtained in 96%, fair in 3%, and poor in 1%.
The second part of the study dealt with lateral stenosis.
Drawing from the experience gained by experiments performed in 1993 on five cadavers and by translaminar epidural endoscopy since 1986, this surgical technique was designed to provide decompression by resection of the ventral zone of the articular facet and, in some cases, foramenostomy.
Of the 19 patients treated, nine presented with pathology in one segment, nine in two segments, and one in three segments.
All had lumbar and sciatic complaints, intermittent neurological claudication and predominantly lateral sensory motor deficit.
The general results were good in 84% and fair in 16%.
The effects of "Care-insurance" on the situation of those in need of home care, is the object of first implementation-studies of SGB XI.
They largely agree on the high level of satisfaction found among those who draw the benefits of the insurance scheme, particularly among those who claim a cash premium; further they largely agree on the low level of influence of the "Care-insurance" on changes in the form of nursing.
An account of the results of the milieu-oriented "Freiburger Pflegestudie", which investigates the effects of "Care-insurance" differentiated according to the various types of care-situations, forms the centre of the article.
A possible intraoperative complication of laparoscopic cholecystectomy is opening of the gallbladder with subsequent loss of gallstones.
We report on a 61-year-old woman who was hospitalised with an obscure subhepatic tumor.
Intraoperatively an abscess was found that had been caused by lost gallstones following after laparoscopic cholecystectomy 3 years previously.
There is a low incidence of late abscesses caused by loss of gallstones, but because of the long latency and unspecific symptoms there may be problems in diagnosis.
Taking into consideration possible complications caused by intraoperative loss of gallstones, all concrements should be retrieved, even though there is no indication for changing to an open procedure.
Since squamous cell carinoma of the penis is rare, prospective trials do not exist.
Therefore, new treatment strategies have to be developed.
Based on our experience with the treatment of 22 patients with penile squamous cell carcinoma, we describe our therapeutic approaches.
Ten patients with superficial disease (T1-2N0M0) were treated with partial penectomy.
The 3-year survival rate amounted to 90 %.
In patients with extensive disease (T3-4 or N1-3) a partial or total penectomy was performed.
After initial antibiotic therapy for 4 weeks, patients underwent inguinal lymph-node dissection and if the nodes were positive, additional pelvic lymph-node dissection.
In patients with ulcerous inguinal lymph-node metastases surgical resection was performed, covering the wound with a musculocutaneous flap (tensor fascia lata flap n = 2; rectus abdominis flap n = 1).
The 3-year survival rate of patients with T1-2N1 tumours (n = 4) was 67 % and with T3-4N1-3 (n = 8) 25 %.
Patients with distant metastases received inductive systemic chemotherapy with cisplatin, methotrexate and bleomycin.
Objective responses occurred in 22 % (1 CR, 1 PR) of 9 patients.
These results suggest that immediate radical surgery with lymph-node dissection is the best treatment for squamous cell carcinoma of the penis.
Biomechanical investigations in eight specimen elbow joints to test articulated external fixation showed correct extension-flexion joint position between 0 and 120 °.
The central axis through the radial and ulnar condyles varies less than 3 ° in total.
X-ray kinematography showed correct articulation in all cases without subluxation.
In six patients with persistent subluxation and complex fracture of the proximal ulna external fixation with an additional articulation was placed.
All patients began with physiotherapy on the 3rd day after operation, the range of joint motion was 0-30-95 ° in all cases, after 6 weeks 0-30-110 °.
Additional articulated external fixation at the elbow joint can be an alternative treatment to long-term transfixation of the elbow in cases of complex injury.
How important and predicative are clinical parameters and locoregional failure after radical radiotherapy of oropharyngeal carcinomas for the probability of the occurrence of distant metastases?
From 1 August 1990 to 1 October 1998, 139 patients with carcinomas of the oropharynx were treated in a prospective study by radical radiotherapy and evaluated in regard to the clinical parameters reflex-otalgia, predominant structure of tumor growth, T-category, presence of involved lymph nodes, and smoking and drinking habits.
Twenty-nine patients received a concomitant chemotherapy.
Twenty-five out of 139 patients had a planned neck dissection after completion of radiotherapy.
Ten patients received a salvage operation.
The median follow-up time was 24 months (range, 4 to 74).
Two- and 5-year overall survival rates according to Kaplan Meier were 56.1 and 49.6%.
The tumors were controlled in 77/139 patients (55%).
The therapy failed in 62/139 patients (45%).
Both groups, 62 patients with locoregional therapy failure and 77 patients with locoregionally controlled tumors, were comparable in regard to performance status (Karnofsky index), age, gender, TNM-categories, histological differentiation, drinking habits, pretherapeutic diagnostics, total dose (Gy), and number of simultaneous chemotherapy cycles.
Locoregional tumor control was significantly determined by the parameters reflex-otalgia (p < 0.0078), predominant growth pattern (p < 0.012), T-category (p < 0.03), and smoking (p < 0.0285).
The median survival time of patients with locoregional failure is 17 months.
At this moment 81% of locoregionally controlled patients are still alive.
In 14/62 patients (23%) with locoregional failure, distant metastases were detectable against 4/77 (5%) of locally controlled patients, p < 0.0026.
Probability of local control and distant metastases, predominantly pulmonary, reached a plateau after 24 months.
Locoregional tumor control, determined by several clinical parameters, is an important parameter for the probability of the development of distant metastases.
Failure of local therapy is caused by the biologic aggressiveness of the tumor.
Telemedicine includes all medical activities in diagnosis, therapeutics, or social medicine undertaken by means of an electronic transfer medium, enabling the transmission of visual and acoustic information over long distances to doctors not personally present at the place of the requested consultation.
The aim of this study was to evaluate the retropatellar pressure, force, and contact area in cases of knee arthroplasty compared to knees without arthroplasty.
We examined six leg specimens before and after knee arthroplasty.
The modified Thiel fixation was used, and arthroplasty was the Genesis I without patellar implant (Fa.
Smith & Nephew, Schenefeld).
Contact measurements were performed with pressure-sensitive film (Fuji Prescale type "super low") in 45 °, 60 °, 90 °, and 120 ° knee flexion.
The results were evaluated with special software, "Pressure Imaging and Analyzing System FPD-901 Series".
The leg was exarticulated in the hip joint and the knee joint was opened from a suprapatellar approach.
The film was placed at a defined area between the facies patellaris of the femur and facies articularis of the patella.
Instantaneous pressure was measured during a time of 5-s pressure increase and a further 5 s. A force of 280 N was applied to the quadriceps muscle.
Before knee arthroplasty, the contact area measured 154.3 mm2, the average pressure was 1.14 MPa, the force 182.13 N. After knee arthroplasty, the contact area was 119.94 mm2, the average pressure 1.522 MPa, the force 180.98 N. Following knee arthroplasty the contact area decreased significantly (P=0.015), and the average (P=0.0001) and maximum pressure (P=0.0003) increased significantly.
The force did not change significantly (P=0.7642).
The choice of the knee arthroplasty implant and approach to the knee joint should be considered in order to achieve an increased retropatellar contact area thus preventing smaller contact areas than before knee arthroplasty.
The increased contact area could also prevent increasing retropatellar pressures after knee arthroplasty and further complications.
Maculopathy occurring in young patients is a challenge in differenzial diagnosis.
Besides hereditary macular dystrophies and acquired macular degenerations, rare systemic disorders should be considered.
Histological examination of 1660 biopsies (2 - 5 mm) of the synovial membrane of 317 patients were obtained by arthroscopic dissection; in 70% of all cases non-specific changes were revealed and in 30% specific changes.
The findings included different stages of proliferation of the superficial layer, uncharacteristic inflammatory reactions of the stratum synoviale and fibrosis of the stroma, vascular proliferation and pseudopolypoid thickening of the synovial membrane.
The histomorphological findings can only be interpreted reliably and a pathogenetic classification obtained, e.g., detritus synovialitis, rheumatoid arthritis or post-traumatic changes, if the arthroscopic findings conclude an exact documentation of the biopsy site and the clinical findings.
The aim of this study was to determine the impact of prolonged single lung ventilation and intrathoracic insufflation of CO2 during computer-enhanced totally endoscopic bypass grafting on biventricular myocardial function.
Methods: Transesophageal echocardiography was performed intraoperatively in 20 patients undergoing the above mentioned operation.
At distinct time points during the intervention, a cine-loop of both ventricles was registered employing a mid short axis view.
Simultaneously, oxygenation parameters as well as electrocardiographic data and intrathoracic CO2 pressure were taken.
Wall motion analysis was done postoperatively.
Results: With increasing duration of single lung ventilation, significant regional and global biventricular hypokinesia was detected.
This was accompanied by a decrease in PaO2 and a marked increase in intrathoracic CO2 pressure.
These alterations disappeared after weaning from extracorporeal circulation and reconstitution of double lung ventilation.
Conclusion: These results show that computer-enhanced coronary artery bypass grafting leads to significant alterations in intraoperative biventricular myocardial function.
This can be due to either an impact on oxygenation during single lung ventilation or due to intrathoracic CO2 insufflation.
However, in our group, these alteration showed only small clinical relevance.
During the last few years the fast development of different laser and laser-like systems for photoepilation and their one-sided representation in media has led to confusion among pysicians and patients.
The object of this review is to give a structured report of different pulsed laser and laser-like systems (Epilight, Photoderm, long-pulsed ruby-, alexandrite- and diodelaser) that are available in Germany, including their side effects and complications.The current status of scientific investigation in this field is discussed.
The purpose of the present study was to increase the free range of motion in conventional trust-plate prosthesis design and to optimize the trust-plate contact as well as the osteointegration area below the trust-plate.
Although familial occurrence of fibromyalgia syndrome (FMS) has been commonly observed, data on a genetic role in this condition are limited.
A few studies have reported familial aggregation and association with HLA.
We have studied genetic linkage of FMS with HLA in multicase families, and found a rather weak linkage of FMS with HLA (P<0.029).
Malformations of the urinary tract are one of the most common types of anomalies in the neonatal period.
Approximately 15-20% of all prenatally detected malformations  require acute postnatal imaging.
Sonography is the primary imaging modality in the evaluation of nephro-urologic problems in infancy.
Hydronephrosis represents the most common pathology, followed by multicystic-dysplastic kidney.
Discussion: The result of the sonographic examination directs further imaging.
An adequate diagnostic algorithm is decisive  for accurate diagnosis, for the appropriate therapeutic regimen and for the prognosis  of the patients.
Calcification is one of the main causes of failure of porcine bioprosthetic heart valves, a problem which has not been satisfactorily solved to date.
Previous studies have shown that calcification is decreased in porcine heart valves that have undergone treatment for lipid extraction.
The relation between lipid distribution and calcification of seven new commercially available porcine bioprosthetic heart valves (St. Jude Medical, Bioimplant) is assessed by Sudan red III staining to show preexisting lipids.
All porcine bioprosthetic valves contained lipids to different degrees.
Five valves were subjected to the pulsatile accelerated calcification process for 4 weeks.
Distribution and level of calcification were evaluated by radiography and compared to the Sudan red-stained fatty areas.
Comparison of the calcifications detected by radiography and the macroscopically detected lipids showed a coincidence of 57-66%.
Two porcine bioprosthetic valves were histologically prepared and stained with Hematoxylin and von Kossa's stain, respectively.
By light microscopy, the von Kossa staining revealed microcalcifications and polarizing microscopic investigation showed birefractive substances in areas with lipid deposits.
These preexisting substances in porcine valve tissue may play a determinative role in the calcification of the tissue.
Substantial studies are necessary to further determine the role of preexisting lipids in calcification.
Therapy for hip dysplasia and DDH by means of sonography.
Numerous methods are available for treating "congenital" dysplasia of the hip (CDH).
The important point seems to be the differentiation between dysplastic hip joints with and without displaced femoral heads.
A historical review of the diagnosis of so-called "congenital dysplasia" and dislocation of the hip and different indications for therapeutic maneuvers is given.
Generally, a three-step plan of treatment is recommended: dislocated heads must be reduced, after which retention is needed until the hip joint is stable.
This is followed by maturation period, until the nonossified hyalin cartilagineous performed acetabular roof is ossified.
All hip joints, regardless of age, can be assigned to one of these phases.
In all cases, measures are taken to prevent ischemic necrosis of the femoral head.
To prevent the residual dysplasia of the acetabulum roof and femoral head necrosis, the reduction-retention position should be more than 90  ° flexion in the hip joint, but not more than 45-50  ° abduction.
In each therapeutic phase there is a different biomechanical situation in the hip joint.
The appropriate orthosis for treatment is chosen according to the particular biomechanical situation.
Each sonographic type can be set up according to the our classification in the three-phase treatment system.
In this way the adequate orthosis for treatment in each treatment-phase can be chosen.
A case of a patient with malignant acanthosis nigricans in association with carcinoma of the lung is reported, documenting successful palliative treatment of the warty papillomatous thickening of the lips with electrocautery.
Molecular atmospheric oxygen contains two unpaired electrons in the unreactive triplet state and thus has to be activated in order to react with other biological molecules in the singlet ground state.
These processes of activation include very reactive intermediates.
Therefore, aerobic cells must cope with - and to some extent also adapt to - oxidative stress provoked for example by infection or intoxication, where reactive intermediates of oxygen activation accumulate.
Depending on the strength of these impacts, several symptoms indicate the deviation from normal, steady-state metabolism.
Most of these visible or measurable symptoms are connected with oxygen activation where principally a transition from heterolytic reactions (two-electron transitions) to increased homolytic reactions (one-electron transitions) is observed.
Homolytic reactions produce free radicals, which are generally counteracted by a parallel increase of intrinsic radical scavenging processes or by compounds administered with food, thus warranting metabolic control within certain limits.
At advanced states of stress, control may be gradually lost and chaotic radical processes dominate.
Finally, cellular decompartmentalizations yield apoptotic, lytic and/or necrotic processes.
Every episode during this cascade is characterizable by the balance between pro- and antioxidative capacities.
Antioxidants, which in many cases are free radical scavengers or quenchers of activated states, comprise a wealth of classes of organic molecules including phenolics, probably as the most prominent ones.
In this article, mechanisms of oxygen activation and protection from oxidative damage are discussed.
Furthermore, examples of antioxidative functions of a few important natural products are reported.
In a monocenter prospective randomized double-blind clinical trial the efficacy of homeopathic treatment was investigated on children with adenoid vegetations justifying an operation.
Patients were treated with either homeopathic remedies such as Nux vomica D200, Okoubaka D3, Tuberculinum D200, Barium jodatum D4 and Barium jodatum D6 or with placebo.
The duration of the study for each patient was 3 months.
Examination of the ears using a microscope, rhinoscopy, stomatoscopy and pharyngoscopy, as well as tympanometry and audiometry were performed after 4, 8 and 12 weeks.
Out of a total of 97 children studied between the ages of 4 to 10 years 82 could be analyzed.
At the end of the study no operation was required in 70.7% of the placebo-treated children and in 78.1% of the children treated with homeopathic preparations.
These results show no statistical significance.
A treatment technique favorable for linacs with asymmetric jaws, which combined cranio-caudal matching fields with fields enclosing the whole target volume, is investigated with respect to field matching and sparing of normal tissue and organs at risk.
For a pelvic target volume rapidly varying in cranio-caudal direction a 5-field technique was planned with individually weighted and blocked fields.
Three fields adjoining in cranio-caudal direction were completed by 2 fields enclosing the whole target volume.
The matching line was measured and calculated with Helax TMS©.
Furthermore a 4-field box and opposing fields were planned.
The dose-volume histograms for target, bladder, intestine and soft tissue were exported.
Normal tissue complication probability and tumor control probability, respectively, were calculated for all techniques.
In the region of the matching line the summation of the measured normalized curves resulted in relative dose maxima of 6.0% (caudal) and 4.5% (cranial), respectively.
For fields enclosing the whole target volume the dose maxima in the region of the matching line decreased to 2.0% (caudal) and 1.8% (cranial), respectively.
For the dose profiles calculated with Helax TMS© no overdose was found.
The 5-field technique with adjoining fields results in a better sparing of the organs at risk compared to the other techniques, whereas the tumor control remains the same.
In specific cases a technique with cranio-caudal adjoining fields can be recommended with respect to sparing of normal tissue and organs at risk.
Disseminated Langerhans-cell-histiocytosis (LCH) is most frequent in children at the age of 1-3 years, seldomly seen in adults and extremely rare in the elderly.
The clinical course may be acute, subacute or chronic, progressive or stationary.
Spontaneous remissions are possible, but rare.
In elderly patients often the disease is at first limited to the skin before it becomes systemic.
Because of its central location, the elbow joint is considered the most important joint within the upper extremity from the viewpoint of function.
Trauma to osseous and ligamentous structures of the proximal forearm confronts trauma surgeons and orthopedic specialists with numerous diagnostic and therapeutic challenges.
Conditions following elbow trauma are often accompanied by chronic pain and diminished range of motion, leading to functional deficits of the entire arm.
There is now practically no doubt that primary osteosynthesis, anatomical joint reconstruction and early onset of functional treatment are essential for a good final outcome.
With our expanding knowledge of the anatomical and biomechanical condtions in the proximal lower arm in the last few decades the basic principles of therapy have also changed, and current standards of treatment for proximal forearm trauma are presented in this paper with reference to the relevant literature.
The series of five patients with symptomatic isolated right ventricular outflow tract ectopy and no structural heart disease which were successfully treated with radiofrequency ablation of the ectopic focus are reported in order to discuss radiofrequency ablation as an alternative treatment in patients with right ventricular outflow tract ectopy without ventricular tachycardia.
Basic principles for treating patients with chronic pain are presented.
They are the result of a longterm collaboration of collegues from different medical specialties in the pain outpatient unit of the University of Ulm.
In contrast to a variety of literature on chronic pain patients, these principles focus on the contribution of the therapists to the development of problems in treatment.
Eight principles, considered especially important for the treatment of chronic pain patients are presented and discussed.
We discuss this entity with the aid of a case report and the existing literature.
The therapy of these tumors includes resection and possible adjuvant radiotherapy.
Rhabdomyosarcomas are an exception, because they also show a good response to chemotherapy.
14 human femurs were scanned by CAT and 3D reconstructed.
In every specimen digital documentation of CCD and antetorsion (AT) angle was performed.
With a special software package (Orthodoc) virtual preoperative planning for implantation of a cementless total hip alloplasty was undertaken.
The specimens were randomised into two groups, one of which had manual and the other one robot implantation of the femoral component.
After implantation all specimens were evaluated again by CAT and CCT and AT angle were documented again.
The preoperative CCD angle was 126.7  ° (SD = 4.0) in the manual group and 127.8  ° (SD = 4.3) in the robodoc group.
Postoperatively the angle averaged 131.9  ° (SD = 0.8) in the manual group and 133.2  ° (SD = 1.9) in the robodoc group.
Significant differences were found for the AT angle in both groups.
The preoperative AT angle in the manual group was 31.3  ° (SD = 8.8), decreasing to 20.5  ° (SD = 9.5) after implantation.
In the robodoc group this angle was 30.9  ° (SD = 8.0) before and 31.3  ° (SD = 8.7) after implantation.
The difference between pre- and postoperative AT angle averaged 10.8  ° (SD = 6.4) in the manual group and only 0.4  ° (SD = 0.9) in the robodoc-group.
Conclusion: With the technique used, preoperative planning in hip alloarthroplasty is much more accurate than with the conventional technique with plain X-ray.
The virtual preoperative planning can be transferred to the intraoperative setting with high precision.
These factors may lead to an increase in outcome quality.
1000 drug-related fatalities that were examined in Hamburg from 1990-1996 by the Institute of Legal Medicine were analysed with respect to consumption of substitute drugs such as methadone.
The incidence of methadone-related fatalities has increased in the last two years.
The highest incidence was found in 1995 when methadone was detected in the blood of about 20% of all drug-related fatalities.
Lethal monointoxications or combined intoxications with a dominant role of methadone were experienced rarely (about 1% of all drug-related fatalities).
Of the persons who were enroled since 1990 in a methadone maintenance programme 2% have been registered as drug- related fatalities.
The mortality of street addicts without comparable medical help was about 10% in the same period.
There is further need for improved methods of registration, documentation and forensic/sociological analysis of all drug-related fatalities for reliable conclusions concerning mortality rates of drug users who are enroled in methadone maintenance programmes.
Pulmonary infections and tumors are a major cause of death in patients with AIDS.
The combination of clinical, radiological, laboratory, and pathohistological data helps to narrow the spectrum of differential diagnoses or even allows a specific diagnosis in many patients.
Nevertheless, an accurate diagnosis should be obtained as soon as possible during the clinical course of the illness to initiate treatment in time.
Computed tomography (CT) has proven to provide promising results in the diagnosis of AIDS-related thoracic diseases.
The aim of this paper was to demonstrate the diagnostic capacities of CT in the context of particular AIDS-related thoracic pathologies.
Additional information on the spectrum of pathological agents and on differential diagnostic signs is summarized.
This study was designed to provide information to which extend home-based nursing care services for the elderly take part in the care for older people with mental disorders.
Also of interest was the involvement of clinical facilities and services of the geropsychiatric treatment system in the health care for the clients.
A one day data collection in 29 nursing care services in two North Rhine-Westphalian regions could raise informations about 1,246 clients aged 60 years and over 1, 522 persons (41.8%) had a mental disorder, diagnosed by a nursing and/or medical professional.
68% of the mental disordered clients had dementia or a demential disorder, 6% a functional psychoses, and 31% a neurotic, psychogenic disorder or substance abuse (small number of clients with two and more diagnoses).
82% of clients with mental disorders had one or more additional somatic disease(s).
These diseases were mostly the cause for the involvement of home-based nursing care service.
Barely 8% of clients with mental disorders were placed from clinical facilities and services of the geropsychiatric treatment system into the nursing care services.
Beside the home-based care, only 12% of mental disordered received clients outpatient psychiatric treatment.
Systematic cooperation between the nursing care services and the system of (gero-) psychiatric treatemnt was a rare exception.
Acute cerebral nerve paresis can be caused in many different ways.
One of the more rare causes of paresis of one or more neural pathways is dissection of the internal carotid artery.
Early diagnosis is important, even with atypical symptoms, since prompt anticoagulative therapy can hinder stroke from embolism due to the dissection.
We report on two patients with Raeder's syndrome and Collet-Sicard syndrome resulting from dissection of the internal carotid artery.
Besides the cranial and caudal nerves involved in our study, loss of function has also been reported with the sixth to eighth cranial nerves, so that any painful, sudden cranial nerve deficiency can indicate possible carotid dissection.
In hematopoiesis, regulation and differentiation present a very complex functional network in which multiple factors of the microenvironment are involved.
In addition to direct cell-to-cell contacts and the modifying influences of the intercellular matrix, soluble mediators play an important role in intercellular communication.
Cytokines exert their effects by binding with specific receptors that transfer their signals to individual cells.
A common structure shared by subunits of these receptors leads to competitive inhibition in binding the cytokines with different affinity.
By this mechanism specificity is reduced, on the one hand; however, on the other the complexity of interactions in the bone marrow is enhanced.
A flood of in vitro and in vivo studies have established the impact of various cytokines on single hematopoietic cell lineages and their application for clinical use.
However, there is a lack of knowledge concerning the cellular origin of the cytokines.
According to the results of our studies elements of the erythro- and megakaryopoiesis are the source of cytokines like IL-1, IL-3, IL-6, and GM-CSF.
Wound healing represents a dynamic process of increasing scientific interest, especially with the detection of the different growth factors.
Economic aspects are also of importance in the investigation of substances used for wound healing.
In Germany 25% of all patients (ca.
1 million) with severe chronic venous insufficiency have crural ulcers.
The influence of bacterial infection of crural ulcers is controversial.
There is no doubt that the quantity of bacteria is of importance.
Local antibiotic treatment is difficult, as most of the substances used are known to inhibit wound healing.
In vivo and in vitro investigations showed, that chiniofon-containing antiseptic has a bacteriostatic function.
Additionally it was shown, using cultures of fibroblasts, that chiniofon-containing antiseptic does not inhibit the growth of fibroblasts, whereas PVP-iodine solution, a widely used antiseptic, clearly reduces the growth of fibroblasts.
The good clinical results in the treatment of acute and chronic radiation damage indicate that chiniofon-containing antiseptic may have antiflammatory activity.
This article presents the heuristics concerning description of individual generative behavior.
The aim is to describe the development of the desire for children, the generative action and the dealing with generative decisions for intended and unintended childless women and men as well as parents.
The main emphasis of the existing heuristics is placed on psychological questions.
These heuristics explain patterns and influencing factors of generative action as well as positive and negative influencing factors of the coping process.
It may be helpful to use heuristics which describe development of and coping with generative action as background information to ensure comprehensive consultation and therapy planning.
Morbus Parkinson is a progressive degenerative disease of the human central, peripheral, and enteric nervous systems.
In the course of the disease, not only the substantia nigra, but also extranigral components of the motor system, as well as numerous limbic system and autonomic centers undergo serious damage.
Accordingly, Parkinson's disease is a multisystem disorder.
Only specific types of projection neurons fall victim to it.
The first manifestation of the pathological process which causes the disease are abnormalities of the neuronal cytoskeleton.
Intracytoplasmic inclusions evolving in the form of Lewy bodies in perikarya and Lewy neurites in the neuronal processes result in premature cell death of the affected neurons.
On the basis of this selective neuronal vulnerability, a categorization emerges of the pathological changes within the nervous system and corresponding functional impairments.
Introduction: Children with "nursing bottle syndrome" and long standing teeth destructions and no treatment so far were examined for accompanying pathological changes in the bacterial flora of the mouth and alterations due to chronic inflammation of the oral mucosa and the alveolar jawbone.
Osteomyelitis is an infection of the bone marrow caused by both non-specific and specific agents.
Non-specific endogenic osteomyelitis represents the most frequent form, followed by the specific form caused by Mycobacterium tuberculosis infection.
Typically, the non-specific form occurs in children and young adults, and the sites most frequently affected are the distal and the proximal ends of the tibia and femur.
In tuberculosis, osteomyelitis is predominantly located in the vertebral bodies.
In rare cases osteomyelitis can be caused by viruses, fungi or echinococcus.
It may also occur as so-called acute endogenic osteomyelitis, such as plasmocellular osteomyelitis and Brodie's abscess.
Histologically, dense infiltration of leucocytes, granulation tissue and bone sequesters can be seen.
In tuberculosis granulomas with central necrosis, epithelioid cells and giant cells of Langhans type are characteristically found.
Most forms of acute osteomyelitis can be successfully treated with antibiotics, leading to complete healing without complications.
Only a few reported cases develop into a secondary, chronic form.
